Privacy Policy for Children
We at TinyTap Ltd. (“
TinyTap
” “
us
“, “
we
“, or “
our
“) believe your privacy is important. This Privacy Notice describes the kind of information we collect from you when you play Games on our website or app. This Privacy Notice is part of our Terms of Service, available at http://tinytap.it/site/terms/. If a capitalized word is not defined in this Privacy Notice, it has the meaning we gave it in the Terms of Service. A word is defined when it is written between two quotation marks. This Privacy Notice also explains how we use and keep the information we collect and when we transfer that information to other people or businesses. Additionally, this Privacy Notice describes the ways you can control how we use your information. We encourage you to read this Privacy Notice with your parent or legal guardian. If you have questions about how we use your information, you should speak with your parent or legal guardian or you can contact us with your questions.
We and your Group Leader or Parent control and decide together how your Personal Information is used and who can use it. Our registered office is Gershon Shatz 41, Tel Aviv, Israel  and our registration number is 51-481451-6.
“Personal Information” means any information that refers, is related to, or is associated with an identified or identifiable individual or as otherwise may be defined by applicable law.  This means that any information related to or about a specific person that can help someone else identify that person can be considered Personal Information (or as decided by the law that applies to you).
Privacy Notice Key Points
Below are some key points about how we use and collect your Personal Information. If you want more information about how we use and collect your Personal Information, please read the rest of this Privacy Notice.
Personal Information We Collect.
When your parent, guardian or School (teacher), registers you to use one of our Games, we collect Personal Information provided by or about you, such as your name and birth date. We may also collect what is referred to as ‘special categories of data’, which is protected in a special way by the law. We also automatically collect information about how you use our website or app, like what Games you play.
Reasons for Using and Collecting Your Personal Information.
We need to use your Personal Information so that you can use our website and/or app. We also use your Personal Information to improve our products, for marketing, to understand how people use our website and app, for our records, to protect the security of the website and app and to prevent people from misusing our website and app.
How We Use the Information We Collect.
We use the information (including Personal Information) we collect mainly to provide our website and app to you, send messages to your parent or legal guardian and make our website and app better.
Sharing the Personal Information We Collect
. We may share the Personal Information we collect with other businesses we work with who help us provide the website and app. We also share Personal Information about how you use our website, app and/or Game(s) with your Group Leader or Parent.
International Transfer
. We may give your Personal Information to other businesses or people we work with who are in different countries than you. We make sure that these businesses are required to protect your privacy as strongly as we do. By allowing you to use our website or app, your parent or legal guardian allows us to transfer your Personal Information to other countries.
Your Rights.
Depending on the law that applies to you and other rights described below, you may have a right to see, adjust or delete Personal Information we collect about you. You can also notify us that you don’t want us using your Personal Information in certain ways, such as to show you personalized advertisements.
Use of Cookies and Similar Technologies.
We use certain technologies such as cookies to help personalize our website and app and the ads we show you. You can decide that you don’t want us to use certain cookies by disabling cookies in your device’s settings.
How Long We Keep Your Information.
We keep Personal Information for as long as we need it for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice.
How We Protect Information.
We do our best to follow the standards that most companies in our industry use to protect your Personal Information, but they do not promise that Personal Information will be completely safe.
Changes to the Privacy Notice
. We may change this Privacy Notice sometimes. If we make any change we will tell you and your parent or guardian.
Information We Collect
We collect Personal Information from you when you play Games on our app or website. We also collect Personal Information about you, when your parent, legal guardian or School (teacher) registers you to our website and app.
If you send us a message or contact us we also may collect some Personal Information from you.
Examples of Personal Information we collect from you are your name, birth date, the language you use when playing a Game or using our app or website, what Games you play and other information about how you use and play our Games.
We also automatically collect information about your computer, phone or other mobile device, such as your operating system, device ID and device language.
We collect any pictures, documents or audio recordings you or someone on your behalf uploads to our website or app. For example, if you create your own Game, we collect any pictures, images, content, text and audio recordings you include in the Game.
There is a law called the General Data Protection Regulation which protects your privacy and controls how other people can use your Personal Information, in short, the “GDPR.” The GDPR states that special types of information, referred to as ‘special categories of data’, can only be collected and used if you (if you have the appropriate age) or your parent or legal guardian clearly agree thereto.
‘Special categories of data” means information about:
Race
Ethnic origins
Political Opinions
Religious or philosophical beliefs
Trade Union Membership
Genetic data
Biometric data
Health data
Data concerning sex life or sexual orientation
When we collect and use your Personal Information we may collect ‘special categories of data,’ which includes how you play our Games, your scores and how you act when using our website or app. We will only use this type of information, if your parent or guardian has agreed thereto.
You do not have to give us any Personal Information, but if you do not want to, you might not be able to use our website or app and play our Games.
How We Use Your Personal Information
We and other companies and businesses we work with use your Personal Information in different ways:
to provide our app and website to you;
to send messages to your parent or legal guardian;
to help us make new games and products and to make our Games, website and app better;
to send your parent or legal guardian messages and advertisements that match your interest, which we think we understand, based on the Games you play;
to understand how users use our website and app and if our website and app is working well;
to protect the security of our website and app and to stop other people from misusing the website and app; and
to assist you use our website and app, should you need any assistance.
We study and combine all the information we collect from the different users of our site and website to create what is called “
Statistical Information.
” Statistical Information helps us understand how our users are using our Games and how we can improve them. This information does not include Personal Information. We may share Statistical Information with other people and business we work with.
In order to understand how people use our website and app we use tools that tell us how often you play our games, what games you play and what other website or applications you used before playing our games. We use the information we get from these tools to make our website and app better. One of the tools we use is “Google Analytics”. You can read about the ways Google Analytics can use and collect your information in the Google Analytics Terms of Use located at
http://www.google.com/analytics/terms/us.html
and the Google Privacy Policy located at
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
.
We also may use your Personal Information in other ways the law allows or requires us to.
Other People We Transfer Information To
We may share your information, including Personal Information, with other people or business in the following ways:
Businesses We Work With: We may disclose Personal Information we collect about you or from you or anyone on your behalf, to other businesses we work with. These businesses use your Personal Information to help us provide our website and app to you and to help us understand how people use our website and app.
Transfers to Other Countries: We may transfer your information (including Personal Information) to other people and businesses we work with who are outside your country. We make sure that these businesses are required to protect your privacy as strongly as we do. By allowing you to use our website or app, your parent or legal guardian allows us to transfer your Personal Information to other countries.
If We Sell Our Business: If we sell our company or some of it or are negotiating with someone to sell it, we can give the person or business who buys our company with access to your Personal Information. If that happens, your Personal Information will still be treated in the same way described in this Privacy Notice.
Law Enforcement: We may share your Personal information if a court or law enforcement authority tells us to or in order to follow any legal or regulatory obligation. We may also share your Personal Information with other people if we believe in good faith that it is appropriate to protect our or any third party’s rights, property or safety (including enforcing this Privacy Notice or our Terms of Service).
Group Leaders and Parents: If you are a member of a Group on our website or app, we may share Personal Information about the Games you play and how you use the website and app to the Group Leader.
Other Products and Services: We allow you to use our app and website together with some services of other businesses. If you use our website or app together with the services of other businesses, we may receive information (including Personal Information) about you from those businesses. Remember that if you use any services of other businesses outside our website or app, these businesses will decide how your information is used and collected.
How We Protect Information
We do our best to follow the standards that most be companies in our industry use to protect your Personal Information. But, no method of transferring information on the internet or electronically storing information is 100% safe. As a result, even though we try our best to protect your Personal Information, we cannot promise it will be completely safe.
Your Rights
You have certain rights about the Personal Information that we have about you. “Rights” are things you should have or be able to do. We may ask you for proof of your identity (who you are) before we provide any information or follow your request:
Right to See and Give Other People Your Information.
You have a right to know what Personal Information we collect about you and sometimes to have us give that information to you. Depending on the legal rules that apply to you, you may have the right to get a copy of the information you gave us (without any information we got from other people or companies) in a clear and readable format. You can also ask us to give that Personal Information to other people. If you want to exercise this right please email us and tell us what information you want to get or give to another person or company. Before you email us, please speak to and get permission from your parent or legal guardian. Please remember that we may not be able to give all the information you ask for, such as for example, if the information you want includes the Personal Information of another person. If we can’t give you the information you asked for, we will try to explain to you why. We try to answer any request to exercise these rights as soon as possible.
Right to Adjust Personal Information.
Depending on the legal rules that apply to you, you may have the right to ask us to update, adjust or delete information that is incorrect or out of date.  If you think any Personal Information we have about you is wrong, you can also ask us to stop using that information, while we review your request. We will adjust your Personal Information within a reasonable amount of time after we receive a written request from you.
Right to Delete Personal Information.
In some situations you have a right to have us delete Personal Information we have about you. If you want us to delete any Personal Information, please let us know by emailing us at the email address listed below. Before you email us, please speak to and get permission from your parent or legal guardian. Depending on the legal rules that apply to you, we will delete Personal Information you gave us within a reasonable amount of time after we receive a written request from you. We cannot restore (bring back) information that we delete. If you want to make sure that we do not continue to collect information from you, you should make sure to delete our app from your mobile devices and ask your parent or legal guardian to cancel your account with us and clear cookies from any device on which you used our app or website. If you do not know how to remove our app or cookies from your device, you should ask your parent or legal guardian. We may keep certain Personal Information (even after you ask us to delete) for our records or other purposes allowed or required under the law that applies to you. We may keep your information in an anonymzed form. This means other people will not be able to identify you or know who you are if they see that information.
Right to Cancel Your Account.
You can cancel your account through our website or app, or by emailing us at the email address written below. Before you email us, please speak and get permission from your parent or legal guardian.  In order to cancel your account, we may ask you for more information.
Right to Stop Getting Marketing.
If you do not want us to use your Personal Information to send your parent or guardian marketing messages and show you advertisements, you can email us at anytime at the email address listed below. Before you email us, please speak to and get permission from your parent or legal guardian. We will take care of your request as soon as possible, but it may take a few days before stop using your information in the way you requested.
Right to Stop Us From Using Your Information.
Depending on the rules of the law that applies to you, you may have a right to stop us from using your information, including for the purpose of sending you marketing messages and advertisements.
Supervisory Authority
. If you are a European Citizen, you may have the right to submit a complaint to a supervisory data protection authority (a government organization in charge of protecting your privacy). Please speak with your parent or legal guardian if you think you want to submit a complaint.
How Long We Keep Your Information
We keep information as long as it is needed for the purposes described above. We may delete information without telling you, if we decide we no longer need it for those purposes.
Cookies and Similar Technologies
We use technologies called “cookies” to help us better match our website and app and the ads we show you to you and the things you like. We use a few types of cookies for different purposes:
Type of Cookie
Why We Use These Cookies
Required
These cookies are needed in order to allow our website and app work correctly. They allow you to use the site, move around and play the Games. For example, these cookies remember things you did on one page when you return to that page again.
These cookies cannot be removed.
Functionality
These cookies remember your settings and preferences and the choices you make (such as your language or what country you are in) and match the website and app to your needs and what you like.
Security
These cookies can help us identify and prevent security problems. They may be used to keep information about your visit to the app or website and to stop others from changing your password without your login information.
Performance
These cookies can help us collect information to help us understand how you use our website and app, such as whether you have looked at messages or specific pages and how long you were on each page. This helps us improve the how the website or app works.
Analytics
These cookies help us learn more about which features or parts of our website and app are popular with our users and how we can improve our website and app.
Advertising
These cookies are used in order to show you ads and other content that match your interests or other things you like.
You can decide if you want to receive any cookies or which cookies you receive by adjusting the settings in your browser. You can also delete any cookies at any time. Please remember that if cookies are removed some parts of our website and app may not work correctly.
If you change your cookie preferences, it does not mean that you will not receive any advertisements, it only means that the advertisements you do see will not match as well your interests or things you like.
Third Party Cookies
We use these third-party cookies:
Facebook analytics and ads retargeting (Advertising and Analytics)
Hot-Jar analytics (analytics)
TinyTap Session ID and age and language preferences (Security, Functionality, Necessary)
Google Analytics (Analytics)
Google Tag Manager (Analytics)
Google Ad Remarketing (Advertising)
Stripe Authentication and tracking (Security)
Pinterest (Advertising and Analytics)
Tweeter (Advertising and Analytics)
Bing (Advertising and Analytics)
Applications and Services of Other Business
If you use applications or services of other businesses, remember that we do not have any control over how they use your information and that they will decide the way it is used.
Changes
Before you use our website and app, your parent or guardian has to first accept this Privacy Notice. If your parent or guardian did not agree to this Privacy Notice, please do not use the website or app. We might change this Privacy Notice sometimes. If we make any changes, we will notify you and/or your parent or guardian by posting the updated Privacy Notice on our website and app. The new Privacy Notice will apply to you starting on the date you parent or guardian agrees to it.
Comments and Questions
If you have any questions or want to tell us something about how we use and collect you information, or if you want us to delete or fix your Personal Information, please email us at help@tinytap.it. Please remember to always speak with your parent or legal guardian before emailing us.
Last updated: May 2018
Links
Download TinyTap on the App Store
Download TinyTap on Google Play
Official Site
Media & Press
TinyTap Press Kit
TinyTap Careers
Recent Posts
Why Should Students Play Their Way Into Learning?
Contact Us
TinyTap is looking for an iOS Partner
Pages
5 Tips for Promoting Your TinyTap Games
FAQ
Meet the TinyTap Team
Privacy Policy Children
Privacy Policy for FindIt
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy
Data Sharing Agreement
TinyTap Press Kit
TinyTap Trusted Teachers!
What are TinyTap’s subscription terms?
Why Should Students Play Their Way Into Learning?
איך זה עובד?
ברוכים הבאים לטייני טאפ
זמן איכות משפחתי עם טייני טאפ
מרכז התובנות
Categories
App Store
Children's Authors
Create an App
Creation Inspiration
Games
Guide
hidden
Holidays
How To
Jobs
New features
News
Parenting
Press Release
Sell Your Game
Teach Kids Anything
Teacher of the Month
Teaching
Uncategorized
Verizon
Video
עברית
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 1
https://blog.tinytap.com/privacy-policy-for-findit/:
Privacy Policy for FindIt
Effective Date: January 30th, 2025
Introduction
FindIt (“the App”) is an educational app designed for children, allowing them to explore their environment in a fun and interactive way. Developed by TinyTap Ltd. (“we,” “us,” or “our”), FindIt is committed to protecting the privacy of its users, especially children, while providing a safe and enjoyable experience.
This Privacy Policy explains how FindIt collects, uses, and protects your data. By using FindIt, you agree to the practices described in this policy.
1. Information Collection and Use
1.1 Images Captured During Gameplay
FindIt uses a mobile device’s camera to facilitate gameplay.
•
Captured Images
:
• Parents take pictures of their environment to generate a list of common items using OpenAI’s image-to-text processing service.
• Children use the app to photograph items as part of the gameplay.
•
Processing of Images
:
• Captured images are temporarily uploaded to OpenAI’s image-to-text processing service for:
1. Generating a list of common items for gameplay.
2. Verifying if an item matches the description during gameplay.
• All uploaded images are deleted immediately after processing. No images are stored on our servers or OpenAI’s servers.
•
Local Storage
:
• Thumbnail-sized images of “found” items are stored locally on the user’s device to provide in-game feedback. These thumbnails are not uploaded to any server and are deleted when the app is uninstalled or the game is reset.
•
Content Filtering
:
• OpenAI’s processing service is configured to exclude sensitive or inappropriate content such as people, body parts, weapons, or other unsuitable items.
2. Use of Third-Party Analytics Services
To improve FindIt and understand how users interact with it, we use third-party analytics services such as AppsFlyer, Facebook Analytics, Google Analytics, Mixpanel, and others. These services help us collect anonymous usage data, such as:
• Session duration and frequency of app use
• Features accessed during gameplay
• Device type and operating system
Important Notes
:
• We
do not
collect geographic location or any information that could directly identify users.
• All data collected by these services is anonymized and does not include personally identifiable information.
• These analytics providers may use cookies or similar tracking technologies to collect and process data on our behalf. You can learn more about their data handling practices by reviewing their privacy policies:
•
AppsFlyer Privacy Policy
•
Facebook Analytics Privacy Policy
•
Google Analytics Privacy Policy
•
Mixpanel Privacy Policy
Opting Out
:
• You may opt out of certain analytics services by adjusting your device or app settings or visiting the respective service provider’s opt-out page.
3. How We Protect Your Information
• All image processing occurs over secure, encrypted channels to ensure the safety and privacy of uploaded data.
• Analytics data is anonymized and cannot be used to identify individuals.
• Local data, including thumbnails, remains encrypted and inaccessible to other applications on the device.
4. Parental Consent
FindIt is designed to prioritize child safety and requires parental consent before gameplay. Parents are encouraged to supervise their child’s use of the app and approve all captured images before the game begins.
5. Sharing of Information
We do not share any images, data, or gameplay results with third parties except as described in this policy:
• Anonymous usage data collected via third-party analytics services.
6. Children’s Privacy
We adhere to applicable laws and regulations regarding the privacy of children under the age of 13, including the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) in the United States.
• No identifiable images or personal data are stored or shared.
• Gameplay is designed to exclude sensitive content or imagery.
7. Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy to reflect changes to our practices or for other operational, legal, or regulatory reasons. We encourage you to review this page periodically for the latest information on our privacy practices.
8. Contact Us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy or our data practices, please contact us at:
TinyTap Ltd.
Email: help@tinytap.com
Address: 1811 Silverside Road Wilmington, DE 19810
This version focuses exclusively on FindIt, references TinyTap as its developer, and keeps the policy concise while addressing all necessary privacy considerations.
Links
Download TinyTap on the App Store
Download TinyTap on Google Play
Official Site
Media & Press
TinyTap Press Kit
TinyTap Careers
Recent Posts
Why Should Students Play Their Way Into Learning?
Contact Us
TinyTap is looking for an iOS Partner
Pages
5 Tips for Promoting Your TinyTap Games
FAQ
Meet the TinyTap Team
Privacy Policy Children
Privacy Policy for FindIt
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy
Data Sharing Agreement
TinyTap Press Kit
TinyTap Trusted Teachers!
What are TinyTap’s subscription terms?
Why Should Students Play Their Way Into Learning?
איך זה עובד?
ברוכים הבאים לטייני טאפ
זמן איכות משפחתי עם טייני טאפ
מרכז התובנות
Categories
App Store
Children's Authors
Create an App
Creation Inspiration
Games
Guide
hidden
Holidays
How To
Jobs
New features
News
Parenting
Press Release
Sell Your Game
Teach Kids Anything
Teacher of the Month
Teaching
Uncategorized
Verizon
Video
עברית
Sub-policy 2
https://blog.tinytap.com/terms-of-use/:
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy
PLEASE CAREFULLY READ OUR PRIVACY POLICY, WHICH IS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE, BEFORE USING TinyTap.  These Terms affect your legal rights and obligations.  If you do not agree to be bound by all of these Terms, do not access or use the Service.
Terms of Service
TinyTap, Ltd.  (“
TinyTap
” or “
us
,” “
our
,” “
we
”) is the creator and owner of a social platform that enables users to access, create, and share educational, interactive content and applications (the “
Platform
”) provided through TinyTap’s website and mobile application (collectively “
Site
“).  These Terms of Services (the “
Terms
”) govern your access to and use of the Site and Services (as defined herein) and all content (the “
Content
,” as further defined below) and services available through the Site (the “
Services
”).  The Terms apply to all schools, school districts, educational and other institutions, including trained institutional staff members who are authorized to access the Services on behalf of a school, school district or other institution (each, a “
School
”), as well as individuals who are non-School users of the Services (Schools and individuals, referred to here as “
user
,” “
you
,” or “
your
”). Any minor child you permit to use the Platform and/or Services, subject to the terms hereof shall be referred to as a “
Child
”.
If you are registering on behalf of a School, you represent that: (i) you are authorized to enter into, and bind the School to these Terms and register for the Platform and Services; (ii) you are solely responsible for ensuring that these Terms are in compliance with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to you and the School and the right to access the Platform and Services is revoked where these Terms or use of the Platform and Services is prohibited; (iii) you do not create or maintain an account on behalf of a Child if you or the School have not obtained prior written consent from the Child’s parent or legal guardian (“
Parent
”). (“
Parental Consent
“). If you have created an account on behalf of a Child without having obtained Parental Consent,  you hereby agree to immediately cease any and all use of and activity on such account and delete such account from our Platform by visiting our website or contacting us at help@tinytap.com.
Please read these Terms carefully. These Terms govern your access to and use of the Platform and Services.  By accessing our Platform and/or using our Services you signify your consent to these Terms. The way we collect, process and transfer Personal Information (as defined in the Privacy Notice) is detailed in our Privacy Notice. Changes may be made to these Terms from time to time.  Your continued use of the Platform and/or Services will be deemed acceptable to the amended or updated Terms.  If you do not agree to any of these Terms, please do not click the button marked “I agree” or use the Platform and/or Services.
Account Registration
In order to use most of our Services, you will be required to create an account. Your account allows you to use all the Platform and Services, subject to these Terms and our Privacy Notice. TinyTap reserves the right to refuse to allow a user to open an account for any reason, or to limit the number of accounts a School can establish on the Services, all in its sole discretion.
You may also access the Services by logging in through approved third-party logins, such as Facebook and Google. We may change the method of registration at our discretion. By accessing the Services through approved third-party login, you represent and warrant that the third-party login account is yours and you have full rights to provide us with the information in this account.
Children may access the Services through a subaccount created on their behalf by their Parent, Group Leader (as defined below) or by their School, subject to the School or Group Leader’s written confirmation to TinyTap of receipt of Parental Consent in respect of each Child, before the creation of a sub-account for such Child. The School or Group Leader shall at all times remain liable for all conduct under that subaccount.  Entities or individuals other than Schools, Group Leader or Parents may not use the Services on behalf of children.
When you create a user account (including as a Parent or on behalf of a School or other institution), you will be asked to provide a valid email address.
Certain Services, such as creating games and use of certain games and courses, may be available without account registration.
You are fully and solely responsible for the security of your computer system and all activity on your account, even if such activities were not completed by you.  You agree to notify TinyTap immediately of any unauthorized use of your TinyTap account or password.  TinyTap will not be liable for any losses or damages arising from unauthorized use of your account or password, and you agree to indemnify and hold TinyTap harmless for any improper or illegal use of your account, including any charges and/or taxes incurred, unless you have notified us via email at help@tinytap.com that your account has been compromised and have requested us to block access to it.  We do not police for, and cannot guarantee that we will learn or prevent any inappropriate use of the Platform and/or Services.
Termination of Account
Upon termination, suspension or expiration of the Agreement for any reason, TinyTap may terminate your access to your account at its sole discretion.
TinyTap may terminate your account if you violate any of these Terms.
Upon termination or suspension of your account, you shall not have any further access to any Content (as defined below) that may be available through your account. Any data associated with your account, including any User Content (as defined below), may, at TinyTap’s sole discretion: (i) be deleted from TinyTap and removed from any public area of the Services; or (ii) remain available on the Platform, and accessible to TinyTap users and third parties subject to these Terms.
If TinyTap believes, in its sole discretion, that a violation of these Terms or any illegal or inappropriate usage or behavior has occurred, we may take any other corrective action we deem appropriate.  We reserve the right to investigate suspected violations of these Terms or illegal and inappropriate usage or behavior regarding the Platform and Services. We will fully cooperate with any law enforcement investigation or court order requesting or directing us to disclose the identity, behavior or Content (including User Content) of anyone believed to have violated these Terms or to have engaged in illegal behavior.  Any suspension or termination of your account shall not affect your obligations under these Terms (including but not limited to ownership, indemnification, any representations and warranties made by you, and limitation of liability), which by their sense and context are intended to survive such suspension or termination.
Services
You may use the Platform, as well as the Content and Services provided through it, on your own behalf and/or for the purpose of offering children (subject to Parental Consent as specified herein) educational games, as available on the Platform and/or to create your own educational games. TinyTap may, in its sole discretion and at any time, discontinue providing any part of the Platform and/or Services without notice.
Use of the Services and access to the Platform is void where prohibited by law, regulation or any other obligation.  By using the Site and/or Services, you represent and warrant that (a) all registration information you submit is truthful and accurate; (b) you will maintain the accuracy of such information; (c) you are 18 years of age or older and have the legal ability to form a binding contract; (d) your use of the Platform and Services does not violate any applicable law or regulation or any obligation you may have, including to a third party; (e) you are solely responsible for obtaining any Parental Consent for each Child you give access to a sub-account, as required; and (f) YOU WILL NOT ADD ANY SPECIAL CATEGORIES OF DATA (AS SUCH TERM IS DEFINED IN REGULATION 2016/679 OF THE EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT AND OF THE COUNCIL OF 27 APRIL 2016 ON THE PROTECTION OF NATURAL PERSONS WITH REGARD TO THE PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA AND ON THE FREE MOVEMENT OF SUCH DATA, AND REPEALING DIRECTIVE 95/46/EC (GENERAL DATA PROTECTION REGULATION) (“
GDPR
“) AND IF YOU DO ADD ANY SPECIAL CATEGORIES OF DATA, YOU HEREBY REPRESENT AND WARRANT THAT YOU HAVE OBTAINED EXPLICIT CONSENT IF AND AS REQUIRED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW AND THAT YOU SHALL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE AND LIABLE FOR ANY SUCH DATA, INCLUDING IN THE EVENT OF ANY DATA BREACH BY TINYTAP.
TinyTap hereby grants you with a non-exclusive and non-transferable right to use the Platform and/or Services, in accordance with and subject to these Terms.
Content and User Content
Certain types of content may be made available through the Platform and/or Services.  “
Content
” as used in these Terms means, collectively, all the content on or made available through the Platform and/or Services and any modifications or derivatives of the foregoing.
The Services allow you to add certain content including data, text, files, information, usernames, additional educational content (“
Game
”), graphics, audio recordings, voice recordings profiles, links, images, logos, pictures, photos, video’s, comments, reviews, ratings and other content or materials (“
User Content
”). You are fully and solely responsible for any User Content you submit through the Services.  You represent and warrant that any such User Content complies with all applicable law, that you have all necessary rights to submit any such User Content through the Services and that no such User Content infringes or violates any third-party intellectual property rights, privacy or publicity rights, or moral rights. You further represent and warrant that YOU WILL NOT ADD AND/OR UPLOAD ANY SPECIAL CATEGORIES OF DATA TO THE PLATFORM. TinyTap has no obligation to accept, display, review or maintain any User Content.  Moreover, TinyTap reserves the right to remove and permanently delete or hide any Content, including any User Content submitted or modified by any user, without notice, and for any reason. WE DO NOT ENDORSE ANY CONTENT (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ANY USER CONTENT) OR ANY OPINION, RECOMMENDATION, OR ADVICE EXPRESSED IN ANY USER CONTENT, AND WE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL LIABILITY IN CONNECTION WITH ANY USER CONTENT.
TinyTap may, at its sole discretion, choose to monitor User Content for inappropriate or illegal behavior, including through automatic means; provided, however, that TinyTap reserves the right to treat User Content as content stored at the direction of users for which TinyTap will not exercise editorial control except when violations are directly brought to TinyTap’s attention.  TinyTap has the right to edit, delete, distort, modify or move User Content from the Site and/or Services without notice for any reason at any time.
Content on the Site comes from a variety of sources, including from other users.  You understand that TinyTap is not responsible for the accuracy, usefulness, safety or intellectual property rights of or relating to this Content (including but not limited to User Content).  Although users must agree to these Terms, it is possible that other users (including unauthorized users) may post or transmit offensive or obscene materials to which you may be involuntarily exposed, and you hereby agree to waive, and do waive, any legal or equitable rights or remedies you have or may have against us with respect to thereto. WE DISCLAIM ALL LIABILITY, REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF ACTION, FOR THE ACTS OR OMISSIONS OF OTHER USERS (INCLUDING UNAUTHORIZED USERS), WHETHER SUCH ACTS OR OMISSIONS OCCUR DURING THE USE OF THE SERVICES OR OTHERWISE.
Groups
When using the Platform and/or Services, you may create sub-accounts to your account to assign and make Games and other Content available (each a “
Group
” and such user creating a Group, a “
Group Leader
”). You may create a sub-account for either your Child, in respect of which you have the parental rights and/or as a School, subject to receipt of Parental Consent (each such user, a “
Group Member
”). You will have access to each Group Member’s use and/or progress of each Game or use of other Content assigned or created by you or another Group Leader (each a “
Report
“).  If you are a School or a School’s representative, you hereby agree to keep any such information, including any and all Reports, confidential and not to share such information with any third party, except for each Child’s Parents and/or any additional third parties, expressly permitted, in advance and in writing, by each Child’s Parents. In such capacity, a Group Leader will be considered a co-controller of any Personal Information (as defined in the Privacy Notice) made available and/or provided and/or collected by the Group Leader (including through any Reports). Any processing, transfer, use and/or collecting of Personal Information in your capacity of co-controller shall be subject to the Data Sharing Agreement. You hereby represent and warrant that in your capacity of Group Leader, you will comply with all the terms of the Data Sharing Agreement, which is hereby incorporated by reference.
Creators
You may submit, post, record, upload or display User Content, only if you are authorized to do so and to permit our users to make use of the User Content as set forth in these Terms.  You are responsible at your sole cost and expense for creating backup copies and replacing any User Content that you post or store on the Services.  You may utilize TinyTap to communicate and connect within the Platform, content library, and related services, and to create content that you may use outside of TinyTap.  While we encourage free expression, all creations, profiles, and content should maintain a courteous tone.  Please be aware that the Services are intended to be used by individuals under the age of 13.  Accordingly, exercise common sense and your best judgment when you submit or post User Content or any other information.
When you create a Game (each such user creating a Game, a “
Creator
”), you may elect to assign such Game to a particular Group, submit such Game on the Platform as a public Game (not assigned to a Group), or if you are a TinyTap Premium Plan subscriber, make the Game only privately available, with or without any compensation, as applicable.
License
By posting any User Content, including a Game, whether you make it publicly available, private or only available to a Group on the Platform, or otherwise providing any information to TinyTap, including without limitation Games, drawings, photos, reviews, or other materials you submit to TinyTap through the Services, you hereby grant to TinyTap, its licensees, agents, and users, an irrevocable, worldwide, royalty-free, non-exclusive license to edit, copy, use, reproduce, publish, translate, modify, adapt, transmit, create derivative works from and distribute that User Content and information, as applicable, (in whole or in part) without any compensation , credit or obligation to you, subject to these Terms and the Privacy Notice. Such use must be non-commercial unless the owner of the User Content has given the authorization to make commercial use of User Content directly (for example, by agreeing to revenue sharing under TinyTap Premium Plans as described below and elsewhere on the Services).
By using the Services you acknowledge that TinyTap may use aggregate and/or anonymized data and information uploaded by users, including you to the Platform, including information relating to a Game and/or use thereof and/or of any other content available on the Platform for business, marketing, research and internal purposes, all in accordance with the Privacy Notice.
Except as expressly set forth in our Privacy Notice, we have no obligation of confidentiality with regard to your User Content and we will not be liable for any use or disclosure of any User Content you provide through the Services or otherwise.
Content Restrictions
Without limiting the foregoing, you agree that you will not transmit, submit or post any User Content that: (1) violates the legal rights of others, including defaming, abuse, stalking or threatening users; (2) infringes (or results in the infringement of) other rights of any third party; (3) is or in furtherance of (or you (should) reasonably believe to be) illegal, fraudulent, or unauthorized, counterfeiting, pirating, unauthorized, or violent activity, or that involves (or you (should) reasonably believe to involve) any stolen, illegal, counterfeit, fraudulent, pirated, unauthorized material or special categories of data; (4) does not comply with all applicable laws, rules and regulations; (5) publishes falsehoods or misrepresentations that may damage us or any third party; (6) imposes an unreasonably or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure; or (7) posts, stores, transmits, offers, or solicits anything that contains (or that you know contains links to) the following or to locations that in turn contain links to the following: (a) material that we determine to be offensive (including material promoting or glorifying hate, violence, bigotry, or any entity (past or present) principally dedicated to such causes or items associated with such an entity), (b) material that is racially or ethnically insensitive, material that is defamatory, harassing or threatening, (c) pornography or obscene material, (d) any virus, worm, trojan horse, or other harmful or disruptive component or (e) anything that encourages conduct that would be considered a criminal offense, give rise to civil liability, violate any law or regulation or is otherwise inappropriate or offensive.
Use Restrictions
You may not do or attempt to do any of the following: (1) attempt to decipher, decompile, disassemble, or reverse-engineer any of the software used to provide the Platform and/or Services without our prior written authorization, including framing or mirroring any part of the Platform and/or Services; (2) circumvent, disable, or otherwise interfere with security-related features of the Platform and/or Services or features that prevent or restrict use or copying of any Content; (3) use the Platform and/or Services in connection with any commercial endeavors in any manner, except for the purposes specifically set forth in these Terms; (4) use any robot, spider, assessment search or retrieval application, or any other manual or automatic device or process to retrieve, index, data-mine, or in any way reproduce or circumvent the navigational structure or presentation of the Platform and/or Services; (5) use or access another user’s account or password without permission; (6) use the Platform and/or Services in any manner not permitted by these Terms, or (7) post, distribute or edit any User Content or links in violation of the requests or wishes of the individual that provided you with such User Content or links.
Fees and Payment
TinyTap Premium Plans
TinyTap is pleased to offer TinyTap Premium Plans.  Users who sign up for a TinyTap Premium Subscription Plan have unlimited access to a comprehensive collection of interactive educational lessons, creation packs and the ability to make their own User Content private so that other users may not engage with their User Content without permission. The benefits of a TinyTap Premium Plan are explained in detail on our subscription page.
TinyTap Premium Plans allow teachers to contribute educational User Content and earn revenue from their User Content.  You can learn about becoming a TinyTap Seller on our seller page.
Charges for TinyTap Pro Plans will be provided to you on the Services before you complete your purchase.
Subscription Terms
Subscription costs are subject to change without prior notice.
Payment will be charged from your credit card, iTunes or Google Play account, or PayPal account at confirmation of purchase.
The Subscription automatically renews unless you turn off the auto-renew option at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
Your account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period.
You may manage subscriptions and may turn off auto-renewal by going to your iTunes/PlayStore/PayPal Account Settings after a purchase.
No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during an active subscription period.
Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription to TinyTap.
Where applicable, taxes may also be charged. TinyTap does not accept any responsibility for the calculation or collection of any applicable taxes. Except as expressly provided in these Terms, fees are non-refundable.
TinyTap Premium Revenue Sharing Program
Creators on our Platform may choose to sell their Games and other content via the TinyTap Premium Revenue Sharing Program (“
Revenue Sharing Program
”). You may participate in the Revenue Sharing Program by clicking the button marked “Sell Your Game” and completing the sale form available on our mobile application and website “Game” page. By submitting your Game to our Revenue Sharing Program, you agree to these Terms (including but not limited to ownership, User Content, indemnification, any representations and warranties made by you, and limitation of liability). TinyTap has no obligation to accept any Game to the Revenue Sharing Program.  Moreover, TinyTap reserves the right to remove any Game from the Revenue Sharing Program without notice and for any reason in its sole and absolute discretion.
TinyTap may elect, in its sole discretion, to enroll your Game in our Revenue Sharing Program. If you are not interested in participating in the Revenue Sharing Program, you may opt out on the “Account Settings” page of our website, available at TinyTap Premium Revshare program” in your account settings. By agreeing to these Terms, you hereby consent to the registration of any Game you create or upload to our Platform, and which you have made publically available, to the Revenue Sharing Program.
Creators participating in our Revenue Sharing Program may earn a share of the subscription revenue we collect from users playing their Game(s). After deducting all fees paid to third-party platforms or partners and our own operational and marketing costs, each Creator receives his or her proportional share of the subscription payments collected from each user that consumed their Games (including premium games and premium creation packs) during a particular month. If a particular user did not consume a Creator’s Game in a particular month, such Creator will not earn any share of the subscription revenue collected from that user during such period.
In order to distribute a particular user’s subscription revenue between various Creators, we use a credit system: a Creator receives one credit when (i) the user starts a Game, (ii) the user completes the Game, and (iii) the user consumes a premium creation pack. The sum of the credits earned by a Creator during a particular month represents his or her proportion of the subscription revenue earned from a particular user.
Third Party Applications and Services
Portions of the Platform and/or Services may involve linking to or using web sites belonging to third parties. The Platform may also provide you with links to access the sites of third-party vendors including, without limitation, for the purpose of reviewing or using their services. We have no control over third-party sites and/or mobile applications, and all use of third-party sites and/or mobile applications and services is at your own risk. Additionally, TinyTap cannot accept responsibility for any payments processed or submitted through such third party sites and/or mobile applications, or for the privacy policies of any such sites. TinyTap is not responsible for content or services available by means of such sites and/or mobile applications. TinyTap does not endorse any products or services offered by third parties and we urge our users to exercise caution in using third-party sites.
Intellectual Property
TinyTap, or as the case may be, its licensors, own the Site, Platform, Services, and all Content available therein, including all worldwide intellectual property rights in the Site, Platform and/or Services and the trademarks, service marks, and logos contained therein.  Except as expressly permitted herein, you may not copy, further develop, reproduce, republish, modify, alter download, post, broadcast, transmit or otherwise use the Site, Platform and/or the Services.  You will not remove, alter or conceal any copyright, trademark, service mark or other proprietary rights notices incorporated in the Site, Platform or Services.  All trademarks are trademarks or registered trademarks of their respective owners.  Nothing in these Terms grants you any right to use any trademark, service mark, logo, or trade name of TinyTap or any third party.
TinyTap does not assert any ownership over any submitted User Content. Rather, subject to the rights granted to us in these Terms, you retain full ownership of all of your submitted User Content and any intellectual property rights or other proprietary rights associated with your submitted User Content.
By submitting or posting any User Content, you grant TinyTap and its successors a worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free, perpetual, sublicensable and transferable license to use, copy, distribute, transmit, modify, prepare derivative works of, display, and perform such User Content on, through or in connection with the Site, Platform and/or Services.
Copyright
The policy of TinyTap is not to infringe upon or violate the intellectual property rights or other rights of any third party, and TinyTap will refuse to use and remove any User Content in connection with the Platform that infringes the rights of any third party. Under the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 (the “
DMCA
“), TinyTap will remove any Content (including without limitation any User Content) if properly notified of that such material infringes third party rights, and may do so at its sole discretion, without prior notice to users at any time. The policy of TinyTap is to terminate the accounts of repeat infringers in appropriate circumstances.
You are in the best position to judge whether User Content is in violation of intellectual property or personal rights of any third-party. You accept full responsibility for avoiding infringement of the intellectual property or personal rights of others in connection with User Content
.
TinyTap will remove any Content (including without limitation any User Content) if properly notified of that such material infringes third party rights, and may do so at its sole discretion, without prior notice to users at any time.
If you believe that something appearing on the Site and/or Platform infringes your copyright, you may send us a notice requesting that it be removed, or access to it blocked. If you believe that such a notice has been wrongly filed against you, the DMCA lets you send us a counter-notice. Notices and counter-notices must meet the DMCA’s requirements. We suggest that you consult your legal advisor before filing a notice or counter-notice. Be aware that there can be substantial penalties for false claims. Send notices and counter-notices to us by contacting help@tinytap.com.
Disclaimers & Disclaimer of Warranty
Your use of the Platform and Services is at your sole discretion and risk. The Platform, Content, and Services are provided on an AS IS and AS AVAILABLE basis without warranties of any kind. While we make reasonable efforts to provide Content that is informative and useful, we do not make any warranties or representations in respect of any Content. We do not represent or warrant that you will find the Services and/or any Content to be informative or useful for your own needs.
WE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ALL WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, RELATING TO THE SITE, PLATFORM, CONTENT (INCLUDING USER CONTENT), AND SERVICES, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION THE WARRANTIES OF TITLE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF PROPRIETARY RIGHTS, COURSE OF DEALING OR COURSE OF PERFORMANCE. WE DISCLAIM ANY WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, (I) REGARDING THE SECURITY, ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, TIMELINESS AND PERFORMANCE OF THE PLATFORM AND/OR SERVICES; (II) THAT THE PLATFORM AND/OR SERVICES WILL BE ERROR-FREE OR THAT ANY ERRORS WILL BE CORRECTED; (III) REGARDING THE PERFORMANCE OF OR ACCURACY, QUALITY, CURRENCY, COMPLETENESS OR USEFULNESS OF ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY THE PLATFORM AND/OR SERVICES.
TinyTap makes no warranty that the Reports provided shall be useful to you and/or if you are the School, the Parents of the Child or the School. You and/or the School and/or the Parents or of the Child, as applicable, are solely responsible for any action you and/or the School and/or the Parents of the Child may take based on the Reports.  In making any decision you and/or the School and/or the Parents of the Child should take into account the possibility that information provided by the Reports may not correctly or accurately reflect current or future circumstances.
We are not responsible for any incorrect or inaccurate Content (including but not limited to User Content) posted on the Platform or in connection with the Services, or transmitted by any user, whether by a creator of a Game, User Content and/or Group, users of the Services or by any of the equipment or programming associated with the Services.  No advice or information, whether oral or written, obtained by you from us, shall create any warranty not expressly stated in these Terms.  If you choose to rely on such information, you do so solely at your own risk.  Some states or jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of certain warranties.  Accordingly, some of the above exclusions may not apply to you.
We assume no responsibility for, and you shall not have any valid claim against TinyTap in relation to, error, omission, interruption, deletion, defect, delay in operation or transmission, communications line failure, theft or destruction or unauthorized access to, or alteration of, the Platform, Content and/or Services. We are not responsible for any problems or technical malfunction of any telephone network or lines, computer online systems, servers or providers, computer equipment, software, failure of any email due to technical problems or traffic congestion on the Internet or on any part of the Platform and/or Services, including any injury or damage to users or to any (individual’s) computer and/or mobile device related to or resulting from participation or downloading materials in connection with the Platform and/or Services.  Under no circumstances shall we be responsible for any loss or damage, including personal injury or death, resulting from use of the Platform and/or Services, from any Content posted on or through the Platform and/or Services, or from the conduct of any users of the Platform and/or Services, whether online or offline.
Limitation of Liability
IN NO EVENT SHALL WE OR ANY OF OUR OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, OR AGENTS BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ANY DAMAGES WHATSOEVER, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH YOUR USE OF THE PLATFORM, CONTENT AND/OR SERVICES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE QUALITY, ACCURACY, OR UTILITY OF THE INFORMATION PROVIDED AS PART OF OR THROUGH THE PLATFORM OR THE SERVICES, WHETHER THE DAMAGES ARE FORESEEABLE AND WHETHER OR NOT WE HAVE BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. THE FOREGOING LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW IN THE APPLICABLE JURISDICTION AND IN NO EVENT SHALL OUR MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE LIABILITY TO YOU EXCEED THE AMOUNT YOU HAVE PAID US IN THE TWELVE MONTHS PRECEDING THE APPLICABLE CLAIM. AS SUCH, IF YOU HAVE NOT PAID US ANY AMOUNTS, WE SHALL HAVE NO LIABILITY TO YOU.
Indemnification
You agree to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless TinyTap and our employees, directors, officers, subcontractors and agents, against any and all claims, damages, costs or expenses (including attorneys’ fees) that arise directly or indirectly from: (a) breach of these Terms by you or anyone using your computer, mobile device or password; (b) any claim, loss or damage experienced from your use or attempted use of the Platform and/or the Services; (c) your violation of any law or regulation; (d) your infringement of any right of any third party; (e) any data breach, violation of applicable privacy and data protection laws and regulations by you or anyone on your behalf, including but not limited, where applicable, breach of any of the terms of the Data Sharing Agreement, and (f) any other matter for which you are responsible hereunder or under law.
Territorial Restrictions
The information provided within the Service is not intended for distribution to or use by any person or entity in any jurisdiction or country where such distribution or use would be contrary to law or regulation or which would subject TinyTap to any registration requirement within such jurisdiction or country. We reserve the right to limit the availability of the Services or any portion of the Services, to any person, geographic area, or jurisdiction, at any time and in our sole discretion, and to limit the quantities of any content, program, product, service or other feature that TinyTap provides.
Software related to or made available by the Service may be subject to United States export controls. Thus, no software from the Services may be downloaded, exported or re-exported: (a) into (or to a national or resident of) any country to which the United States has embargoed goods; or (b) to anyone on the U.S. Treasury Department’s list of Specially Designated Nationals or the U.S. Commerce Department’s Denied Person’s List. By downloading any software related to the Services, you represent and warrant that you are not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of, any such country or on any such list.
Miscellaneous
These Terms shall be governed by the laws of the State of Israel.  Any legal or equitable action of whatever nature by or against TinyTap arising out of or related in any respect to these Terms shall be brought only before the jurisdiction of the competent courts of Tel-Aviv, pursuant to any applicable Israeli laws pertaining to subject matter jurisdiction. In any action to enforce these Terms, the prevailing party will be entitled to costs and attorneys’ fees.  Any cause of action against TinyTap must be brought within one (1) year of the date such cause of action arose.  In the event that any provision of these Terms is held to be unenforceable, such provision shall be replaced with an enforceable provision which most closely achieves the effect of the original provision, and the remaining terms of these Terms shall remain in full force and effect.  Nothing in these Terms creates any agency, employment, joint venture, or partnership relationship between you and TinyTap or enables you to act on behalf of TinyTap.  Except as may be expressly stated in these Terms, these Terms constitute the entire agreement between us and you pertaining to the subject matter hereof, and any and all other agreements existing between us relating thereto are hereby canceled. You shall not be entitled to assign any of your rights hereunder to any third party. TinyTap may assign any and all rights hereunder to any third party.
Last Updated: May 2018
Privacy Policy
Privacy Notice
We at TinyTap Ltd. (“
TinyTap
” “
us
“, “
we
“, or “
our
“) recognize and respect the importance of maintaining the privacy of our customers. If not otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms have the meaning given to them in the Terms of Service (the “
Terms
“).  This Privacy Notice describes the types of information we collect from you or your Child when visiting our Platform and/or Site.  This Privacy Notice also explains how we may process, transfer, store and disclose the information collected, as well as your ability to control certain uses of the collected information.
TinyTap Ltd. is the data controller in respect of certain processing activities outlined in this Privacy Notice. Our registered office is Gershon Shatz 41, Tel Aviv, Israel and our registration number 51-481451-6.
If you are a Group Leader, you may receive or have access to certain Personal Information (as defined below) of other users (including Reports). Similarly, if you are a Parent, you may receive certain Personal Information relating to your Child’s use of the Platform. In such capacity, you will be considered a co-controller of any Personal Information made available and/or provided and/or collected by you and your collection, processing and transfer of any Personal Information as a co-controller is subject to the Data Sharing Agreement as can be found on our website.
“
Personal Information
” means any information that refers, is related to, or is associated with an identified or identifiable individual or as otherwise may be defined by applicable law.
Privacy Notice Key Points
The key points listed below are presented in further detail throughout this Privacy Notice. These key points do not substitute the full Privacy Notice.
Personal Information We Collect.
When you register, we collect Personal Information provided by you, such as your name and email address and any User Content you may upload to the Platform, if you register a Child (subject to Parental Consent as required under the Terms), such Child’s name and birth date. If you register through a third party, we may collect information from such third party account. Combining certain information, including information regarding your progress and/or participation in a Game and/or other Content available on the Platform may result in our collection of ‘special categories of data’ (as such term is defined in the Terms). We also (automatically) collect information about your use of the Platform and/or Site. If you contact us for questions or complaints, we will collect the information related to your inquiry.
Basis for Processing Your Personal Information.
Processing your Personal Information is necessary for the performance of the Terms and the provision of the Platform and Services to you. Processing for the purposes of developing and enhancing our products and services, for marketing purposes, for analytics and usage analysis, for fraud prevention and security and for our recordkeeping and protection of our legal rights – are all necessary for the purposes of legitimate interests that we pursue.
How We Use the Information We Collect.
We use the information (including Personal Information) we collect mainly to administer and provide our Platform, Site, and Services, contact you with administrative information, contact you with marketing offers (if you indicated your desire to receive them, to the extent required by applicable law), and improve the Platform and Site.
Sharing the Personal Information We Collect
. We may share the Personal Information we collect with our service providers and subcontractors who assist us in the operation of the Platform and Services and process the information on our behalf and under our instructions, as well as with any relevant Group Member.
International Transfer
. We may use service providers and/or subcontractors and/or cooperate with or have business partners and affiliates located in countries other than your own, and send them your Personal Information. We will ensure to have agreements in place with such parties ensuring the same level of privacy and data protection as set forth in this Privacy Notice. You hereby consent to such international transfer.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law and additional rights as set forth below, you may have a right to access, update and/or delete your Personal Information and obtain a copy of the Personal Information we have collected about you. You can change your mind at any time about your election to receive marketing communications from us and/or having your Personal Information processed for direct marketing purposes. Subject to applicable law, you may have the right to object to processing your personal data in certain circumstances, including for marketing purposes.
Use of Cookies and Similar Technologies.
We use cookies and similar technologies to help personalize your experience. You can adjust your settings to determine which cookies you do or do not allow. Changing your settings and/or deleting existing cookies may affect the Services.
We retain information for as long as necessary for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Notice.
We implement industry standard measures aimed at reducing the risks of damage and unauthorized access or use of Personal Information, but they do not provide absolute information security.
Changes to the Privacy Notice
. We may change this Privacy Notice from time and shall notify you of such changes.
Information We Collect
We collect information from you when you choose or permit a Child to use our Platform, Services and/or when you visit or use our Site.  In order to access certain services and content on our Platform, you will be required to register an account for yourself or on behalf of a Child and provide us with certain Personal Information. Registration of a Child is permitted only if you are such Child’s Parent or if you have obtained Parental Consent, in accordance with the Terms. We also collect Personal Information when you make use of the Platform and/or Site, request information from us, sign up for newsletters or our email lists, complete online forms, or contact us for any other reason. If you use the Platform or Site by logging in through any third-party login service, we may also receive Personal Information about you as provided or available by such third-party login service. Please check such third-party’s policies in order to understand what information we receive.
Examples of the Personal Information that we collect from you may include your or a Child’s name, birth year, your email address and other information regarding your and/or the Child’s use of and activity on the Platform, preferred language and age group, device location, language settings, and device type,  as well as certain user characteristics and preferences (such as whether a user is a teacher, Parent, Child, student or member of a particular class and/or School and/or Group). Such Personal Information may be collected by us through the Platform and/or Site.
Combining certain information, including information regarding your progress and/or participation in a Game and/or other Content available on the Platform may result in our collection of ‘special categories of data’ (as such term is defined in the Terms).
We also collect any materials including images, pictures, text, documents, audio recordings, comments, reviews, follows and likes, assignments, ratings,  photo’s or other User Content, you may provide, including when uploading a Game to the Platform and/or Site.
In addition, when you use the Platform and/or Site, certain information may be automatically gathered about your computer or mobile devices, such as operating system, device ID, device language, as well as your browsing history and any information regarding your viewing and user history on our Platform or Site.
It is your voluntary decision whether to provide us with any such Personal Information, but if you refuse to provide such information we may not be able to register you or your Child to the Platform and/or Services.
How We Use Your Personal Information
General
We and any of our trusted third-party subcontractors and service providers may use the Personal Information we collect from and about you for any of the following purposes: (1) to provide you with the Platform and Services; (2) to respond to your inquiries or requests, contact and communicate with you; (3) to develop new products or services and conduct analyses to improve our current content, products, and Services; (4) to provide you with customized content, subject to your consent as may be required under applicable law, targeted offers  on the Platform and/or Site, on other third-party sites or apps you may visit, or via e-mail; (5) to contact you with informational newsletters and promotional materials relating to our Platform or Services; (6) to review the usage and operations of our Platform, Services and/or Site; (7) to use your data in an aggregated, non-specific format for analytical purposes (as detailed below); (8) to prevent fraud, protect the security of our Platform, Services and/or Site, and address any problems with the Platform, Services and/or Site;(9) to provide customer support; (10) collect information for machine learning algorithms that helps us present better recommendations to you and (11) gather and present your or your child’s games performance reports.
Statistical Information
By analyzing all information we receive, including all information concerning users, we may compile statistical information across a variety of platforms and users (“
Statistical Information
“). Statistical Information helps understand trends and customer needs so that new products and services can be considered and so existing products and Services can be tailored to customer desires. Statistical Information is anonymous and aggregated and we will not link Statistical Information to any Personal Information. We may share such Statistical Information with our partners, without restriction, on commercial terms that we can determine in our sole discretion.
Analytics
We, or our service providers or subcontractors, may use analytics tools (“
Tools
“), including “Google Analytics” to collect information about the use of the Platform and/or Site. Such Tools collect information such as how often users visit the Platform and/or Site, what pages they visit when they do so, and what other sites and mobile applications they used prior to visiting the Platform and/or Site. We use the information we get from the Tools to improve our Platform, Site, and Services.  Google’s ability to use and share information collected by Google Analytics about your visits to this site is restricted by the Google Analytics Terms of Use and the Google Privacy Policy as stated on their website.
Behavioral Remarketing
TinyTap ltd uses remarketing services to advertise on third party websites to you after you visited our Service. We and our third-party vendors use cookies to inform, optimize and serve ads based on your past visits to our Services.
Google AdWords
Google AdWords remarketing service is provided by Google Inc.
You can opt-out of Google Analytics for Display Advertising and customize the Google Display Network ads by visiting the Google Ads Settings page.
Google also recommends installing the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on for your web browser.  Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on provides visitors with the ability to prevent their data from being collected and used by Google Analytics.
For more information on the privacy practices of Google, please visit the Google Privacy & Terms web page.
Facebook
Facebook remarketing service is provided by Facebook Inc.
You can learn more about interest-based advertising from Facebook on its website.
To opt-out from Facebook’s interest-based ads follow the instructions from Facebook on their website.
Facebook adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising established by the Digital Advertising Alliance. You can also opt-out from Facebook and other participating companies through the Digital Advertising Alliance in the USA, the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada in Canada, or the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance in Europe, or opt-out using your mobile device settings.
For more information on the privacy practices of Facebook, please visit Facebook’s Data Policy.
Pinterest
Pinterest remarketing service is provided by Pinterest Inc.
You can opt-out from Pinterest’s interest-based ads by enabling the “Do Not Track” functionality of your web browser or by following Pinterest’s instructions on their website.
You can learn more about the privacy practices and policies of Pinterest by visiting their Privacy Policy page.
Legal Uses
We may use your Personal Information as required or permitted by any applicable law.
Disclosure of Information
We may share your information, including Personal Information, as follows:
Business Partners, Service Providers, Affiliates, and Subcontractors
We may disclose information, including Personal Information we collect from and/or about you, to our trusted service providers, business partners, affiliates and subcontractors, who may use such information to: (1) help us provide you with the Platform, Services and/or Site; and (2) aid in their understanding of how users are using our Platform, Services and/or Site.
Disclosure to Group Leaders
If you are a Group Member, we may disclose information (including Personal Information) regarding your activity on the Platform and/or Site to the Group Leaders, as well as to any third party to whom you request we provide such information. If you are a Child, we will disclose or give access to your Personal Information to your Parent, and if we have received Parental Consent, to a Group Leader.
International Transfer
We may use subcontractors and service providers and have business partners and affiliates who are located in countries other than your own and send them the information we receive (including Personal Information). We will ensure that these third parties will be subject to written agreements ensuring the same level of privacy and data protection as set forth in this Privacy Notice. You hereby consent to such international transfer.
Business Transfers
We may transfer our databases containing your Personal Information if we sell our business or part of it, including in cases of liquidation. Information about our users, including Personal Information, may be disclosed as part of, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets or acquisition and shall continue being subject to the provisions of this Privacy Notice.
Law Enforcement Related Disclosure
We will fully cooperate with any law enforcement authorities or court order requesting or directing us to disclose the identity, behavior or (digital) content and information of or related to an individual, including in the event of any user suspected to have engaged in illegal or infringing behavior. We may also share your Personal Information with third parties: (i) if we believe in good faith that disclosure is appropriate to protect our rights, property or safety (including the enforcement of the Terms and this Privacy Notice); (ii) to protect the rights, property or safety of third parties; (iii) when required by law, regulation subpoena, court order or other law enforcement related issues; or (iv) as is necessary to comply with any legal and/or regulatory obligation. You can request such Personal Information as specified herein by emailing us at help@tinytap.com.
Other Uses or Transfer of Your Information
We allow you to use our Platform and/or Site in connection with third-party services, sites, and/or mobile applications. If you use our Platform and/or Site with or through such third-parties, we may receive information (including Personal Information) about you from those third parties. Please note that when you use third-parties outside of our Platform and Site, their own terms and privacy policies will govern your use of those services.
How We Protect Information
We make efforts to follow generally accepted industry standards to protect the Personal Information submitted to us, both during transmission and once we receive it. However, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure. Therefore, while we strive to use commercially acceptable means to protect your Personal Information, we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
How to Access and Limit Our Use of Certain Information
You have certain rights in relation to the Personal Information that we hold about you, as detailed below. We reserve the right to ask for reasonable evidence to verify your identity before we provide any information and/or comply with any of your requests, as detailed below:
The right of Access and Data Portability.
You have a right to know what Personal Information we collect about you and, in some cases, to have the information communicated to you. Subject to the limitations in applicable law, you may be entitled to obtain from us a copy of the Personal Information you provided to us (excluding information that we obtained from other sources) in a structured, commonly-used, and machine-readable format, and you  may have the right to (request that we) transmit such Personal Information to another party. If you or wish to exercise this right please contact us letting us know what information, in particular, you would like to receive and/or transmit. Subject to applicable law, we may charge you with a fee. Please note that we may not be able to provide you with all the information you request, for instance, if the information includes Personal Information about another person. Where we are not able to provide you with information that you have asked for, we will endeavor to explain to you why. We will try to respond to any request for a right of access as soon as possible.
Right to Correct Personal Information.
Subject to the limitations in applicable law, you may request that we update, correct or delete inaccurate or outdated Personal Information and/or that we suspend the use of Personal Information, the accuracy of which you may contest, while we verify the status of that Personal Information. We will correct your Personal Information within a reasonable time from the receipt of your written request thereof.
Deletion of Personal Information.
In certain circumstances, you have a right to have Personal Information that we hold about you deleted. Should you wish to have any Personal Information about you deleted, please contact us, using the contact information specified in this Privacy Notice. Subject to applicable law, we will delete Personal Information provided to us within a reasonable time from the receipt of a written (including via email) request by such user to delete such collected Personal Information. We cannot restore information once it has been deleted. Please note that to ensure that we do not collect any further Personal Information, you should also delete our mobile application from your mobile devices and terminate your account with us and clear our cookies from any device where you have used our Platform and/or Site. We may retain certain Personal Information (including following your request to delete) for audit and record-keeping purposes, as well as other purposes, all as permissible and/or required under applicable law. We may also retain your information in an anonymized form.
Account Deactivation.
You may deactivate your account through our website and/or mobile application or by contacting us using the information below. In order to deactivate your account, we may ask you for additional information.
Direct Marketing Opt Out.
You can change your mind at any time about your election to receive marketing communications from us and/or having your Personal Information processed for direct marketing purposes. If you do, please update your account settings on our website, or notify us by contacting us as detailed in this Privacy Notice. We will process your request as soon as reasonably possible, however, it may take a few days for us to update our records before any opt-out is effective.
Right to Object.
Subject to applicable law, you may have the right to object to the processing of your Personal Information including for the purpose of direct marketing.
Supervisory Authority
. If you are a European Citizen, you may have the right to submit a complaint to the relevant supervisory data protection authority.
Data Retention
We retain information as necessary for the purposes set forth above. We may delete information from our systems, without notice to you, once we deem it is no longer necessary for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Notice.
Cookies and Similar Technologies
What are Cookies?
A cookie is a small piece of text that is sent to a user’s browser or device. The browser provides this piece of text to the device of the originating user when this visitor returns.
A “session cookie” is temporary and will remain on your device until you leave the Platform or Site.
A “persistent” cookie may be used to help save your settings and customizations across visits. It will remain on your device for much longer or until you delete it.
First-party cookies are placed by us, while third-party cookies may be placed by a third party. We use both first- and third-party cookies.
Information may also be collected through web beacons, which are small graphic images (“pixel tags”), which usually work together with cookies in order to identify users and user behavior. These may be shared with third parties.
We may use the terms “cookies” to refer to all technologies that we may use to store data in your browser or device or that collect information or help us identify you in the manner described above.
How We Use Cookies
TinyTap uses cookies and similar technologies for a number of reasons, for example, in order to help personalize your experience and to help personalize the ads we serve you.
The specific names and types of the cookies, web beacons, and other similar technologies we use may change from time to time. However, the cookies we use generally fall into one of the following categories:
Type of Cookie
Why We Use These Cookies
Necessary
These cookies are necessary in order to allow the Site, Platform and Services work correctly. They enable you to access the site, move around, and access different services, applications, and tools. Examples include remembering previous actions (e.g. entered text) when navigating back to a page in the same session. These cookies cannot be disabled.
Functionality
These cookies remember your settings and preferences and the choices you make (such as language or regional preferences) and help us personalize your experience and offer you enhanced functionality and content.
Security
These cookies can help us identify and prevent security risks. They may be used to store your session information to prevent others from changing your password without your login information.
Performance
These cookies can help us collect information to help us understand how you use our Site and/or Platform, such as whether you have viewed messages or specific pages and how long you spent on each page. This helps us improve the performance of our Services.
Analytics
These cookies help us learn more about which features are popular with our users and how our Services can be improved.
Advertising
These cookies are placed in order to deliver content, including ads relevant and meaningful to you and your interests. They may also be used to deliver targeted advertising or to limit the number of times you see an advertisement. This can help us track how efficient advertising campaigns are, both for our own Services and for other websites.
How to Adjust Your Preferences
Most Web browsers are initially configured to accept cookies, but you can change this setting so your browser either refuses all cookies or informs you when a cookie is being sent. In addition, you are free to delete any existing cookies at any time. Please note that some features of the Services may function improperly when cookies are disabled or removed.
Adjusting your preferences as described in this section herein does not mean you will no longer receive advertisements, it only means the advertisement you do see will be less relevant to your interests.
Third Party Cookies
We use the following third-party cookies:
Facebook analytics and ads retargeting (Advertising and Analytics)
Hot-Jar analytics (analytics)
TinyTap Session ID and age and language preferences (Security, Functionality, Necessary)
Google Analytics (Analytics)
Google Tag Manager (Analytics)
Google Ad Remarketing (Advertising)
Stripe Authentication and tracking (Security)
Pinterest (Advertising and Analytics)
Tweeter (Advertising and Analytics)
Bing (Advertising and Analytics)
Third-Party Services: YouTube API
Our application integrates with the YouTube API Services to show video content selected by the content creators. By using our application, you acknowledge and agree to be bound by the YouTube Terms of Service (
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
) and the Google Privacy Policy (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
). For further information on how YouTube handles data, please review these policies.
Third-Party Services: Google Fonts
Andika Font:
[Copyright (c) 2020, SIL International](https://software.sil.org/andika), with Reserved Font Name Andika.
This Font Software is licensed under the SIL Open Font License, Version 1.1.
This license is copied below, and is also available with a FAQ at: (https://openfontlicense.org)
Poppins Font:
[Copyright (c) 2022, Indian Type Foundry](https://fonts.google.com/specimen/Poppins), with Reserved Font Name Poppins.
This Font Software is licensed under the SIL Open Font License, Version 1.1.
This license is copied below, and is also available with a FAQ at: (https://openfontlicense.org)
Third-Party Applications and Services
All use of third-party applications or services is at your own risk and subject to such third party’s privacy policies.
Communications
Subject to your consent and applicable law, we may send you e-mail or other messages and/or a newsletter about us or our Platform and/or Services. You may remove your Personal Information from our mailing list and stop receiving future communication from us by following the UNSUBSCRIBE link located at the bottom of each communication or by emailing us at help@tinytap.com.  You will also be given the opportunity to unsubscribe from commercial messages and service-related communications in any such e-mail or message we send, as well as through your account settings on the Platform.
Children
We collect personally-identifiable information from children under the age of sixteen (16) only subject to Parental Consent. In the event that you become aware that an individual under the age of sixteen (16) has enrolled without Parental Consent, please advise us immediately.
Changes
When creating a sub account, you shall be asked to accept the terms of this Privacy Notice on your behalf or on behalf of your / a Child (for the avoidance of doubt, if you are not a Parent and you accept the Privacy Notice on behalf of a Child, you represent and warrant that you have obtained consent from the Child’s Parent to accept this Privacy Notice on the Parent’s behalf. If you do not agree with the terms hereof, please do not use or permit your Child to use the Platform and/or Site.  We may update this Privacy Notice from time to time – in which case, we shall notify you of such changes. We will post the updated Privacy Notice on this page. Please come back to this page every now and then to make sure you are familiar with the latest version. Any new Privacy Notice will be effective from the date it is accepted by you.
Comments and Questions
If you have any comments or questions about our privacy policy, or if you wish for us to amend or delete your Personal Information, please contact us at help@tinytap.com.
Notice to California Residents: Your California Privacy Rights
If you are a California resident, you have the right to receive: a) information identifying all third-party companies to which we may have disclosed, within the past year, personal information pertaining to you for those companies’ direct marketing purposes; and b) a description of the categories of personal information disclosed. To obtain such information, please email your request to help@tinytap.com.
We do not respond to Do Not Track signals at this time.
Privacy Policy for FindIt
Effective Date: January 30th, 2025
Introduction
FindIt (“the App”) is an educational app designed for children, allowing them to explore their environment in a fun and interactive way. Developed by TinyTap Ltd. (“we,” “us,” or “our”), FindIt is committed to protecting the privacy of its users, especially children, while providing a safe and enjoyable experience.
This Privacy Policy explains how FindIt collects, uses, and protects your data. By using FindIt, you agree to the practices described in this policy.
Information Collection and Use
1.1 Images Captured During Gameplay
FindIt uses a mobile device’s camera to facilitate gameplay.
Captured Images
:
Parents take pictures of their environment to generate a list of common items using OpenAI’s image-to-text processing service.
Children use the app to photograph items as part of the gameplay.
Processing of Images
:
Captured images are temporarily uploaded to OpenAI’s image-to-text processing service for:
Generating a list of common items for gameplay.
Verifying if an item matches the description during gameplay.
All uploaded images are deleted immediately after processing. No images are stored on our servers or OpenAI’s servers.
Local Storage
:
Thumbnail-sized images of “found” items are stored locally on the user’s device to provide in-game feedback. These thumbnails are not uploaded to any server and are deleted when the app is uninstalled or the game is reset.
Content Filtering
:
OpenAI’s processing service is configured to exclude sensitive or inappropriate content such as people, body parts, weapons, or other unsuitable items.
Use of Third-Party Analytics Services
To improve FindIt and understand how users interact with it, we use third-party analytics services such as AppsFlyer, Facebook Analytics, Google Analytics, Mixpanel, and others. These services help us collect anonymous usage data, such as:
Session duration and frequency of app use
Features accessed during gameplay
Device type and operating system
Important Notes
:
We
do not
collect geographic location or any information that could directly identify users.
All data collected by these services is anonymized and does not include personally identifiable information.
These analytics providers may use cookies or similar tracking technologies to collect and process data on our behalf. You can learn more about their data handling practices by reviewing their privacy policies:
AppsFlyer Privacy Policy
Facebook Analytics Privacy Policy
Google Analytics Privacy Policy
Mixpanel Privacy Policy
Opting Out
:
You may opt out of certain analytics services by adjusting your device or app settings or visiting the respective service provider’s opt-out page.
How We Protect Your Information
All image processing occurs over secure, encrypted channels to ensure the safety and privacy of uploaded data.
Analytics data is anonymized and cannot be used to identify individuals.
Local data, including thumbnails, remains encrypted and inaccessible to other applications on the device.
Parental Consent
FindIt is designed to prioritize child safety and requires parental consent before gameplay. Parents are encouraged to supervise their child’s use of the app and approve all captured images before the game begins.
Sharing of Information
We do not share any images, data, or gameplay results with third parties except as described in this policy:
Anonymous usage data collected via third-party analytics services.
Children’s Privacy
We adhere to applicable laws and regulations regarding the privacy of children under the age of 13, including the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) in the United States.
No identifiable images or personal data are stored or shared.
Gameplay is designed to exclude sensitive content or imagery.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy to reflect changes to our practices or for other operational, legal, or regulatory reasons. We encourage you to review this page periodically for the latest information on our privacy practices.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy or our data practices, please contact us at:
TinyTap Ltd.
Email: help@tinytap.com
Address:
1811 Silverside Road Wilmington, DE 19810
This version focuses exclusively on FindIt, references TinyTap as its developer, and keeps the policy concise while addressing all necessary privacy considerations.
Last updated: February 2025
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy
PLEASE CAREFULLY READ OUR PRIVACY POLICY, WHICH IS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE, BEFORE USING TinyTap.  These Terms affect your legal rights and obligations.  If you do not agree to be bound by all of these Terms, do not access or use the Service.
Terms of Service
TinyTap, Ltd.  (“
TinyTap
” or “
us
,” “
our
,” “
we
”) is the creator and owner of a social platform that enables users to access, create, and share educational, interactive content and applications (the “
Platform
”) provided through TinyTap’s website and mobile application (collectively “
Site
“).  These Terms of Services (the “
Terms
”) govern your access to and use of the Site and Services (as defined herein) and all content (the “
Content
,” as further defined below) and services available through the Site (the “
Services
”).  The Terms apply to all schools, school districts, educational and other institutions, including trained institutional staff members who are authorized to access the Services on behalf of a school, school district or other institution (each, a “
School
”), as well as individuals who are non-School users of the Services (Schools and individuals, referred to here as “
user
,” “
you
,” or “
your
”). Any minor child you permit to use the Platform and/or Services, subject to the terms hereof shall be referred to as a “
Child
”.
If you are registering on behalf of a School, you represent that: (i) you are authorized to enter into, and bind the School to these Terms and register for the Platform and Services; (ii) you are solely responsible for ensuring that these Terms are in compliance with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to you and the School and the right to access the Platform and Services is revoked where these Terms or use of the Platform and Services is prohibited; (iii) you do not create or maintain an account on behalf of a Child if you or the School have not obtained prior written consent from the Child’s parent or legal guardian (“
Parent
”). (“
Parental Consent
“). If you have created an account on behalf of a Child without having obtained Parental Consent,  you hereby agree to immediately cease any and all use of and activity on such account and delete such account from our Platform by visiting our website or contacting us at help @ tinytap.it.
Please read these Terms carefully. These Terms govern your access to and use of the Platform and Services.  By accessing our Platform and/or using our Services you signify your consent to these Terms. The way we collect, process and transfer Personal Information (as defined in the Privacy Notice) is detailed in our Privacy Notice. Changes may be made to these Terms from time to time.  Your continued use of the Platform and/or Services will be deemed acceptable to the amended or updated Terms.  If you do not agree to any of these Terms, please do not click the button marked “I agree” or use the Platform and/or Services.
Account Registration
In order to use most of our Services, you will be required to create an account. Your account allows you to use all the Platform and Services, subject to these Terms and our Privacy Notice. TinyTap reserves the right to refuse to allow a user to open an account for any reason, or to limit the number of accounts a School can establish on the Services, all in its sole discretion.
You may also access the Services by logging in through approved third-party logins, such as Facebook and Google. We may change the method of registration at our discretion. By accessing the Services through approved third-party login, you represent and warrant that the third-party login account is yours and you have full rights to provide us with the information in this account.
Children may access the Services through a subaccount created on their behalf by their Parent, Group Leader (as defined below) or by their School, subject to the School or Group Leader’s written confirmation to TinyTap of receipt of Parental Consent in respect of each Child, before the creation of a sub-account for such Child. The School or Group Leader shall at all times remain liable for all conduct under that subaccount.  Entities or individuals other than Schools, Group Leader or Parents may not use the Services on behalf of children.
When you create a user account (including as a Parent or on behalf of a School or other institution), you will be asked to provide a valid email address.
Certain Services, such as creating games and use of certain games and courses, may be available without account registration.
You are fully and solely responsible for the security of your computer system and all activity on your account, even if such activities were not completed by you.  You agree to notify TinyTap immediately of any unauthorized use of your TinyTap account or password.  TinyTap will not be liable for any losses or damages arising from unauthorized use of your account or password, and you agree to indemnify and hold TinyTap harmless for any improper or illegal use of your account, including any charges and/or taxes incurred, unless you have notified us via email at help @tinytap.it that your account has been compromised and have requested us to block access to it.  We do not police for, and cannot guarantee that we will learn or prevent any inappropriate use of the Platform and/or Services.
Termination of Account
Upon termination, suspension or expiration of the Agreement for any reason, TinyTap may terminate your access to your account at its sole discretion.
TinyTap may terminate your account if you violate any of these Terms.
Upon termination or suspension of your account, you shall not have any further access to any Content (as defined below) that may be available through your account. Any data associated with your account, including any User Content (as defined below), may, at TinyTap’s sole discretion: (i) be deleted from TinyTap and removed from any public area of the Services; or (ii) remain available on the Platform, and accessible to TinyTap users and third parties subject to these Terms.
If TinyTap believes, in its sole discretion, that a violation of these Terms or any illegal or inappropriate usage or behavior has occurred, we may take any other corrective action we deem appropriate.  We reserve the right to investigate suspected violations of these Terms or illegal and inappropriate usage or behavior regarding the Platform and Services. We will fully cooperate with any law enforcement investigation or court order requesting or directing us to disclose the identity, behavior or Content (including User Content) of anyone believed to have violated these Terms or to have engaged in illegal behavior.  Any suspension or termination of your account shall not affect your obligations under these Terms (including but not limited to ownership, indemnification, any representations and warranties made by you, and limitation of liability), which by their sense and context are intended to survive such suspension or termination.
Services
You may use the Platform, as well as the Content and Services provided through it, on your own behalf and/or for the purpose of offering children (subject to Parental Consent as specified herein) educational games, as available on the Platform and/or to create your own educational games. TinyTap may, in its sole discretion and at any time, discontinue providing any part of the Platform and/or Services without notice.
Use of the Services and access to the Platform is void where prohibited by law, regulation or any other obligation.  By using the Site and/or Services, you represent and warrant that (a) all registration information you submit is truthful and accurate; (b) you will maintain the accuracy of such information; (c) you are 18 years of age or older and have the legal ability to form a binding contract; (d) your use of the Platform and Services does not violate any applicable law or regulation or any obligation you may have, including to a third party; (e) you are solely responsible for obtaining any Parental Consent for each Child you give access to a sub-account, as required; and (f) YOU WILL NOT ADD ANY SPECIAL CATEGORIES OF DATA (AS SUCH TERM IS DEFINED IN REGULATION 2016/679 OF THE EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT AND OF THE COUNCIL OF 27 APRIL 2016 ON THE PROTECTION OF NATURAL PERSONS WITH REGARD TO THE PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA AND ON THE FREE MOVEMENT OF SUCH DATA, AND REPEALING DIRECTIVE 95/46/EC (GENERAL DATA PROTECTION REGULATION) (“
GDPR
“) AND IF YOU DO ADD ANY SPECIAL CATEGORIES OF DATA, YOU HEREBY REPRESENT AND WARRANT THAT YOU HAVE OBTAINED EXPLICIT CONSENT IF AND AS REQUIRED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW AND THAT YOU SHALL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE AND LIABLE FOR ANY SUCH DATA, INCLUDING IN THE EVENT OF ANY DATA BREACH BY TINYTAP.
TinyTap hereby grants you with a non-exclusive and non-transferable right to use the Platform and/or Services, in accordance with and subject to these Terms.
Content and User Content
Certain types of content may be made available through the Platform and/or Services.  “
Content
” as used in these Terms means, collectively, all the content on or made available through the Platform and/or Services and any modifications or derivatives of the foregoing.
The Services allow you to add certain content including data, text, files, information, usernames, additional educational content (“
Game
”), graphics, audio recordings, voice recordings profiles, links, images, logos, pictures, photos, video’s, comments, reviews, ratings and other content or materials (“
User Content
”). You are fully and solely responsible for any User Content you submit through the Services.  You represent and warrant that any such User Content complies with all applicable law, that you have all necessary rights to submit any such User Content through the Services and that no such User Content infringes or violates any third-party intellectual property rights, privacy or publicity rights, or moral rights. You further represent and warrant that YOU WILL NOT ADD AND/OR UPLOAD ANY SPECIAL CATEGORIES OF DATA TO THE PLATFORM. TinyTap has no obligation to accept, display, review or maintain any User Content.  Moreover, TinyTap reserves the right to remove and permanently delete or hide any Content, including any User Content submitted or modified by any user, without notice, and for any reason. WE DO NOT ENDORSE ANY CONTENT (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ANY USER CONTENT) OR ANY OPINION, RECOMMENDATION, OR ADVICE EXPRESSED IN ANY USER CONTENT, AND WE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL LIABILITY IN CONNECTION WITH ANY USER CONTENT.
TinyTap may, at its sole discretion, choose to monitor User Content for inappropriate or illegal behavior, including through automatic means; provided, however, that TinyTap reserves the right to treat User Content as content stored at the direction of users for which TinyTap will not exercise editorial control except when violations are directly brought to TinyTap’s attention.  TinyTap has the right to edit, delete, distort, modify or move User Content from the Site and/or Services without notice for any reason at any time.
Content on the Site comes from a variety of sources, including from other users.  You understand that TinyTap is not responsible for the accuracy, usefulness, safety or intellectual property rights of or relating to this Content (including but not limited to User Content).  Although users must agree to these Terms, it is possible that other users (including unauthorized users) may post or transmit offensive or obscene materials to which you may be involuntarily exposed, and you hereby agree to waive, and do waive, any legal or equitable rights or remedies you have or may have against us with respect to thereto. WE DISCLAIM ALL LIABILITY, REGARDLESS OF THE FORM OF ACTION, FOR THE ACTS OR OMISSIONS OF OTHER USERS (INCLUDING UNAUTHORIZED USERS), WHETHER SUCH ACTS OR OMISSIONS OCCUR DURING THE USE OF THE SERVICES OR OTHERWISE.
Groups
When using the Platform and/or Services, you may create sub-accounts to your account to assign and make Games and other Content available (each a “
Group
” and such user creating a Group, a “
Group Leader
”). You may create a sub-account for either your Child, in respect of which you have the parental rights and/or as a School, subject to receipt of Parental Consent (each such user, a “
Group Member
”). You will have access to each Group Member’s use and/or progress of each Game or use of other Content assigned or created by you or another Group Leader (each a “
Report
“).  If you are a School or a School’s representative, you hereby agree to keep any such information, including any and all Reports, confidential and not to share such information with any third party, except for each Child’s Parents and/or any additional third parties, expressly permitted, in advance and in writing, by each Child’s Parents. In such capacity, a Group Leader will be considered a co-controller of any Personal Information (as defined in the Privacy Notice) made available and/or provided and/or collected by the Group Leader (including through any Reports). Any processing, transfer, use and/or collecting of Personal Information in your capacity of co-controller shall be subject to the Data Sharing Agreement. You hereby represent and warrant that in your capacity of Group Leader, you will comply with all the terms of the Data Sharing Agreement, which is hereby incorporated by reference.
Creators
You may submit, post, record, upload or display User Content, only if you are authorized to do so and to permit our users to make use of the User Content as set forth in these Terms.  You are responsible at your sole cost and expense for creating backup copies and replacing any User Content that you post or store on the Services.  You may utilize TinyTap to communicate and connect within the Platform, content library, and related services, and to create content that you may use outside of TinyTap.  While we encourage free expression, all creations, profiles, and content should maintain a courteous tone.  Please be aware that the Services are intended to be used by individuals under the age of 13.  Accordingly, exercise common sense and your best judgment when you submit or post User Content or any other information.
When you create a Game (each such user creating a Game, a “
Creator
”), you may elect to assign such Game to a particular Group, submit such Game on the Platform as a public Game (not assigned to a Group), or if you are a TinyTap Premium Plan subscriber, make the Game only privately available, with or without any compensation, as applicable.
License
By posting any User Content, including a Game, whether you make it publicly available, private or only available to a Group on the Platform, or otherwise providing any information to TinyTap, including without limitation Games, drawings, photos, reviews, or other materials you submit to TinyTap through the Services, you hereby grant to TinyTap, its licensees, agents, and users, an irrevocable, worldwide, royalty-free, non-exclusive license to edit, copy, use, reproduce, publish, translate, modify, adapt, transmit, create derivative works from and distribute that User Content and information, as applicable, (in whole or in part) without any compensation , credit or obligation to you, subject to these Terms and the Privacy Notice. Such use must be non-commercial unless the owner of the User Content has given the authorization to make commercial use of User Content directly (for example, by agreeing to revenue sharing under TinyTap Premium Plans as described below and elsewhere on the Services).
By using the Services you acknowledge that TinyTap may use aggregate and/or anonymized data and information uploaded by users, including you to the Platform, including information relating to a Game and/or use thereof and/or of any other content available on the Platform for business, marketing, research and internal purposes, all in accordance with the Privacy Notice.
Except as expressly set forth in our Privacy Notice, we have no obligation of confidentiality with regard to your User Content and we will not be liable for any use or disclosure of any User Content you provide through the Services or otherwise.
Content Restrictions
Without limiting the foregoing, you agree that you will not transmit, submit or post any User Content that: (1) violates the legal rights of others, including defaming, abuse, stalking or threatening users; (2) infringes (or results in the infringement of) other rights of any third party; (3) is or in furtherance of (or you (should) reasonably believe to be) illegal, fraudulent, or unauthorized, counterfeiting, pirating, unauthorized, or violent activity, or that involves (or you (should) reasonably believe to involve) any stolen, illegal, counterfeit, fraudulent, pirated, unauthorized material or special categories of data; (4) does not comply with all applicable laws, rules and regulations; (5) publishes falsehoods or misrepresentations that may damage us or any third party; (6) imposes an unreasonably or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure; or (7) posts, stores, transmits, offers, or solicits anything that contains (or that you know contains links to) the following or to locations that in turn contain links to the following: (a) material that we determine to be offensive (including material promoting or glorifying hate, violence, bigotry, or any entity (past or present) principally dedicated to such causes or items associated with such an entity), (b) material that is racially or ethnically insensitive, material that is defamatory, harassing or threatening, (c) pornography or obscene material, (d) any virus, worm, trojan horse, or other harmful or disruptive component or (e) anything that encourages conduct that would be considered a criminal offense, give rise to civil liability, violate any law or regulation or is otherwise inappropriate or offensive.
Use Restrictions
You may not do or attempt to do any of the following: (1) attempt to decipher, decompile, disassemble, or reverse-engineer any of the software used to provide the Platform and/or Services without our prior written authorization, including framing or mirroring any part of the Platform and/or Services; (2) circumvent, disable, or otherwise interfere with security-related features of the Platform and/or Services or features that prevent or restrict use or copying of any Content; (3) use the Platform and/or Services in connection with any commercial endeavors in any manner, except for the purposes specifically set forth in these Terms; (4) use any robot, spider, assessment search or retrieval application, or any other manual or automatic device or process to retrieve, index, data-mine, or in any way reproduce or circumvent the navigational structure or presentation of the Platform and/or Services; (5) use or access another user’s account or password without permission; (6) use the Platform and/or Services in any manner not permitted by these Terms, or (7) post, distribute or edit any User Content or links in violation of the requests or wishes of the individual that provided you with such User Content or links.
Fees and Payment
TinyTap Premium Plans
TinyTap is pleased to offer TinyTap Premium Plans.  Users who sign up for a TinyTap Premium Subscription Plan have unlimited access to a comprehensive collection of interactive educational lessons, creation packs and the ability to make their own User Content private so that other users may not engage with their User Content without permission. The benefits of a TinyTap Premium Plan are explained in detail on our subscription page.
TinyTap Premium Plans allow teachers to contribute educational User Content and earn revenue from their User Content.  You can learn about becoming a TinyTap Seller on our seller page.
Charges for TinyTap Pro Plans will be provided to you on the Services before you complete your purchase.
Subscription Terms
Subscription costs are subject to change without prior notice.
Payment will be charged from your credit card, iTunes or Google Play account, or PayPal account at confirmation of purchase.
The Subscription automatically renews unless you turn off the auto-renew option at least 24-hours before the end of the current period.
Your account will be charged for renewal within 24-hours prior to the end of the current period.
You may manage subscriptions and may turn off auto-renewal by going to your iTunes/PlayStore/PayPal Account Settings after a purchase.
No cancellation of the current subscription is allowed during an active subscription period.
Any unused portion of a free trial period will be forfeited when you purchase a subscription to TinyTap.
Where applicable, taxes may also be charged. TinyTap does not accept any responsibility for the calculation or collection of any applicable taxes. Except as expressly provided in these Terms, fees are non-refundable.
TinyTap Premium Revenue Sharing Program
Creators on our Platform may choose to sell their Games and other content via the TinyTap Premium Revenue Sharing Program (“
Revenue Sharing Program
”). You may participate in the Revenue Sharing Program by clicking the button marked “Sell Your Game” and completing the sale form available on our mobile application and website “Game” page. By submitting your Game to our Revenue Sharing Program, you agree to these Terms (including but not limited to ownership, User Content, indemnification, any representations and warranties made by you, and limitation of liability). TinyTap has no obligation to accept any Game to the Revenue Sharing Program.  Moreover, TinyTap reserves the right to remove any Game from the Revenue Sharing Program without notice and for any reason in its sole and absolute discretion.
TinyTap may elect, in its sole discretion, to enroll your Game in our Revenue Sharing Program. If you are not interested in participating in the Revenue Sharing Program, you may opt out on the “Account Settings” page of our website, available at TinyTap Premium Revshare program” in your account settings. By agreeing to these Terms, you hereby consent to the registration of any Game you create or upload to our Platform, and which you have made publically available, to the Revenue Sharing Program.
Creators participating in our Revenue Sharing Program may earn a share of the subscription revenue we collect from users playing their Game(s). After deducting all fees paid to third-party platforms or partners and our own operational and marketing costs, each Creator receives his or her proportional share of the subscription payments collected from each user that consumed their Games (including premium games and premium creation packs) during a particular month. If a particular user did not consume a Creator’s Game in a particular month, such Creator will not earn any share of the subscription revenue collected from that user during such period.
In order to distribute a particular user’s subscription revenue between various Creators, we use a credit system: a Creator receives one credit when (i) the user starts a Game, (ii) the user completes the Game, and (iii) the user consumes a premium creation pack. The sum of the credits earned by a Creator during a particular month represents his or her proportion of the subscription revenue earned from a particular user.
Third Party Applications and Services
Portions of the Platform and/or Services may involve linking to or using web sites belonging to third parties. The Platform may also provide you with links to access the sites of third-party vendors including, without limitation, for the purpose of reviewing or using their services. We have no control over third-party sites and/or mobile applications, and all use of third-party sites and/or mobile applications and services is at your own risk. Additionally, TinyTap cannot accept responsibility for any payments processed or submitted through such third party sites and/or mobile applications, or for the privacy policies of any such sites. TinyTap is not responsible for content or services available by means of such sites and/or mobile applications. TinyTap does not endorse any products or services offered by third parties and we urge our users to exercise caution in using third-party sites.
Intellectual Property
TinyTap, or as the case may be, its licensors, own the Site, Platform, Services, and all Content available therein, including all worldwide intellectual property rights in the Site, Platform and/or Services and the trademarks, service marks, and logos contained therein.  Except as expressly permitted herein, you may not copy, further develop, reproduce, republish, modify, alter download, post, broadcast, transmit or otherwise use the Site, Platform and/or the Services.  You will not remove, alter or conceal any copyright, trademark, service mark or other proprietary rights notices incorporated in the Site, Platform or Services.  All trademarks are trademarks or registered trademarks of their respective owners.  Nothing in these Terms grants you any right to use any trademark, service mark, logo, or trade name of TinyTap or any third party.
TinyTap does not assert any ownership over any submitted User Content. Rather, subject to the rights granted to us in these Terms, you retain full ownership of all of your submitted User Content and any intellectual property rights or other proprietary rights associated with your submitted User Content.
By submitting or posting any User Content, you grant TinyTap and its successors a worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free, perpetual, sublicensable and transferable license to use, copy, distribute, transmit, modify, prepare derivative works of, display, and perform such User Content on, through or in connection with the Site, Platform and/or Services.
Copyright
The policy of TinyTap is not to infringe upon or violate the intellectual property rights or other rights of any third party, and TinyTap will refuse to use and remove any User Content in connection with the Platform that infringes the rights of any third party. Under the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 (the “
DMCA
“), TinyTap will remove any Content (including without limitation any User Content) if properly notified of that such material infringes third party rights, and may do so at its sole discretion, without prior notice to users at any time. The policy of TinyTap is to terminate the accounts of repeat infringers in appropriate circumstances.
You are in the best position to judge whether User Content is in violation of intellectual property or personal rights of any third-party. You accept full responsibility for avoiding infringement of the intellectual property or personal rights of others in connection with User Content
.
TinyTap will remove any Content (including without limitation any User Content) if properly notified of that such material infringes third party rights, and may do so at its sole discretion, without prior notice to users at any time.
If you believe that something appearing on the Site and/or Platform infringes your copyright, you may send us a notice requesting that it be removed, or access to it blocked. If you believe that such a notice has been wrongly filed against you, the DMCA lets you send us a counter-notice. Notices and counter-notices must meet the DMCA’s requirements. We suggest that you consult your legal advisor before filing a notice or counter-notice. Be aware that there can be substantial penalties for false claims. Send notices and counter-notices to us by contacting help @tinytap.it.
Disclaimers & Disclaimer of Warranty
Your use of the Platform and Services is at your sole discretion and risk. The Platform, Content, and Services are provided on an AS IS and AS AVAILABLE basis without warranties of any kind. While we make reasonable efforts to provide Content that is informative and useful, we do not make any warranties or representations in respect of any Content. We do not represent or warrant that you will find the Services and/or any Content to be informative or useful for your own needs.
WE EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ALL WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, RELATING TO THE SITE, PLATFORM, CONTENT (INCLUDING USER CONTENT), AND SERVICES, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION THE WARRANTIES OF TITLE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT OF PROPRIETARY RIGHTS, COURSE OF DEALING OR COURSE OF PERFORMANCE. WE DISCLAIM ANY WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, (I) REGARDING THE SECURITY, ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, TIMELINESS AND PERFORMANCE OF THE PLATFORM AND/OR SERVICES; (II) THAT THE PLATFORM AND/OR SERVICES WILL BE ERROR-FREE OR THAT ANY ERRORS WILL BE CORRECTED; (III) REGARDING THE PERFORMANCE OF OR ACCURACY, QUALITY, CURRENCY, COMPLETENESS OR USEFULNESS OF ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY THE PLATFORM AND/OR SERVICES.
TinyTap makes no warranty that the Reports provided shall be useful to you and/or if you are the School, the Parents of the Child or the School. You and/or the School and/or the Parents or of the Child, as applicable, are solely responsible for any action you and/or the School and/or the Parents of the Child may take based on the Reports.  In making any decision you and/or the School and/or the Parents of the Child should take into account the possibility that information provided by the Reports may not correctly or accurately reflect current or future circumstances.
We are not responsible for any incorrect or inaccurate Content (including but not limited to User Content) posted on the Platform or in connection with the Services, or transmitted by any user, whether by a creator of a Game, User Content and/or Group, users of the Services or by any of the equipment or programming associated with the Services.  No advice or information, whether oral or written, obtained by you from us, shall create any warranty not expressly stated in these Terms.  If you choose to rely on such information, you do so solely at your own risk.  Some states or jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of certain warranties.  Accordingly, some of the above exclusions may not apply to you.
We assume no responsibility for, and you shall not have any valid claim against TinyTap in relation to, error, omission, interruption, deletion, defect, delay in operation or transmission, communications line failure, theft or destruction or unauthorized access to, or alteration of, the Platform, Content and/or Services. We are not responsible for any problems or technical malfunction of any telephone network or lines, computer online systems, servers or providers, computer equipment, software, failure of any email due to technical problems or traffic congestion on the Internet or on any part of the Platform and/or Services, including any injury or damage to users or to any (individual’s) computer and/or mobile device related to or resulting from participation or downloading materials in connection with the Platform and/or Services.  Under no circumstances shall we be responsible for any loss or damage, including personal injury or death, resulting from use of the Platform and/or Services, from any Content posted on or through the Platform and/or Services, or from the conduct of any users of the Platform and/or Services, whether online or offline.
Limitation of Liability
IN NO EVENT SHALL WE OR ANY OF OUR OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, OR AGENTS BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ANY DAMAGES WHATSOEVER, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH YOUR USE OF THE PLATFORM, CONTENT AND/OR SERVICES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE QUALITY, ACCURACY, OR UTILITY OF THE INFORMATION PROVIDED AS PART OF OR THROUGH THE PLATFORM OR THE SERVICES, WHETHER THE DAMAGES ARE FORESEEABLE AND WHETHER OR NOT WE HAVE BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. THE FOREGOING LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW IN THE APPLICABLE JURISDICTION AND IN NO EVENT SHALL OUR MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE LIABILITY TO YOU EXCEED THE AMOUNT YOU HAVE PAID US IN THE TWELVE MONTHS PRECEDING THE APPLICABLE CLAIM. AS SUCH, IF YOU HAVE NOT PAID US ANY AMOUNTS, WE SHALL HAVE NO LIABILITY TO YOU.
Indemnification
You agree to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless TinyTap and our employees, directors, officers, subcontractors and agents, against any and all claims, damages, costs or expenses (including attorneys’ fees) that arise directly or indirectly from: (a) breach of these Terms by you or anyone using your computer, mobile device or password; (b) any claim, loss or damage experienced from your use or attempted use of the Platform and/or the Services; (c) your violation of any law or regulation; (d) your infringement of any right of any third party; (e) any data breach, violation of applicable privacy and data protection laws and regulations by you or anyone on your behalf, including but not limited, where applicable, breach of any of the terms of the Data Sharing Agreement, and (f) any other matter for which you are responsible hereunder or under law.
Territorial Restrictions
The information provided within the Service is not intended for distribution to or use by any person or entity in any jurisdiction or country where such distribution or use would be contrary to law or regulation or which would subject TinyTap to any registration requirement within such jurisdiction or country. We reserve the right to limit the availability of the Services or any portion of the Services, to any person, geographic area, or jurisdiction, at any time and in our sole discretion, and to limit the quantities of any content, program, product, service or other feature that TinyTap provides.
Software related to or made available by the Service may be subject to United States export controls. Thus, no software from the Services may be downloaded, exported or re-exported: (a) into (or to a national or resident of) any country to which the United States has embargoed goods; or (b) to anyone on the U.S. Treasury Department’s list of Specially Designated Nationals or the U.S. Commerce Department’s Denied Person’s List. By downloading any software related to the Services, you represent and warrant that you are not located in, under the control of, or a national or resident of, any such country or on any such list.
Miscellaneous
These Terms shall be governed by the laws of the State of Israel.  Any legal or equitable action of whatever nature by or against TinyTap arising out of or related in any respect to these Terms shall be brought only before the jurisdiction of the competent courts of Tel-Aviv, pursuant to any applicable Israeli laws pertaining to subject matter jurisdiction. In any action to enforce these Terms, the prevailing party will be entitled to costs and attorneys’ fees.  Any cause of action against TinyTap must be brought within one (1) year of the date such cause of action arose.  In the event that any provision of these Terms is held to be unenforceable, such provision shall be replaced with an enforceable provision which most closely achieves the effect of the original provision, and the remaining terms of these Terms shall remain in full force and effect.  Nothing in these Terms creates any agency, employment, joint venture, or partnership relationship between you and TinyTap or enables you to act on behalf of TinyTap.  Except as may be expressly stated in these Terms, these Terms constitute the entire agreement between us and you pertaining to the subject matter hereof, and any and all other agreements existing between us relating thereto are hereby canceled. You shall not be entitled to assign any of your rights hereunder to any third party. TinyTap may assign any and all rights hereunder to any third party.
Last Updated: May 2018
Privacy Policy
Privacy Notice
We at TinyTap Ltd. (“
TinyTap
” “
us
“, “
we
“, or “
our
“) recognize and respect the importance of maintaining the privacy of our customers. If not otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms have the meaning given to them in the Terms of Service (the “
Terms
“).  This Privacy Notice describes the types of information we collect from you or your Child when visiting our Platform and/or Site.  This Privacy Notice also explains how we may process, transfer, store and disclose the information collected, as well as your ability to control certain uses of the collected information.
TinyTap Ltd. is the data controller in respect of certain processing activities outlined in this Privacy Notice. Our registered office is Gershon Shatz 41, Tel Aviv, Israel and our registration number 51-481451-6.
If you are a Group Leader, you may receive or have access to certain Personal Information (as defined below) of other users (including Reports). Similarly, if you are a Parent, you may receive certain Personal Information relating to your Child’s use of the Platform. In such capacity, you will be considered a co-controller of any Personal Information made available and/or provided and/or collected by you and your collection, processing and transfer of any Personal Information as a co-controller is subject to the Data Sharing Agreement as can be found on our website.
“
Personal Information
” means any information that refers, is related to, or is associated with an identified or identifiable individual or as otherwise may be defined by applicable law.
Privacy Notice Key Points
The key points listed below are presented in further detail throughout this Privacy Notice. These key points do not substitute the full Privacy Notice.
Personal Information We Collect.
When you register, we collect Personal Information provided by you, such as your name and email address and any User Content you may upload to the Platform, if you register a Child (subject to Parental Consent as required under the Terms), such Child’s name and birth date. If you register through a third party, we may collect information from such third party account. Combining certain information, including information regarding your progress and/or participation in a Game and/or other Content available on the Platform may result in our collection of ‘special categories of data’ (as such term is defined in the Terms). We also (automatically) collect information about your use of the Platform and/or Site. If you contact us for questions or complaints, we will collect the information related to your inquiry.
Basis for Processing Your Personal Information.
Processing your Personal Information is necessary for the performance of the Terms and the provision of the Platform and Services to you. Processing for the purposes of developing and enhancing our products and services, for marketing purposes, for analytics and usage analysis, for fraud prevention and security and for our recordkeeping and protection of our legal rights – are all necessary for the purposes of legitimate interests that we pursue.
How We Use the Information We Collect.
We use the information (including Personal Information) we collect mainly to administer and provide our Platform, Site, and Services, contact you with administrative information, contact you with marketing offers (if you indicated your desire to receive them, to the extent required by applicable law), and improve the Platform and Site.
Sharing the Personal Information We Collect
. We may share the Personal Information we collect with our service providers and subcontractors who assist us in the operation of the Platform and Services and process the information on our behalf and under our instructions, as well as with any relevant Group Member.
International Transfer
. We may use service providers and/or subcontractors and/or cooperate with or have business partners and affiliates located in countries other than your own, and send them your Personal Information. We will ensure to have agreements in place with such parties ensuring the same level of privacy and data protection as set forth in this Privacy Notice. You hereby consent to such international transfer.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law and additional rights as set forth below, you may have a right to access, update and/or delete your Personal Information and obtain a copy of the Personal Information we have collected about you. You can change your mind at any time about your election to receive marketing communications from us and/or having your Personal Information processed for direct marketing purposes. Subject to applicable law, you may have the right to object to processing your personal data in certain circumstances, including for marketing purposes.
Use of Cookies and Similar Technologies.
We use cookies and similar technologies to help personalize your experience. You can adjust your settings to determine which cookies you do or do not allow. Changing your settings and/or deleting existing cookies may affect the Services.
We retain information for as long as necessary for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Notice.
We implement industry standard measures aimed at reducing the risks of damage and unauthorized access or use of Personal Information, but they do not provide absolute information security.
Changes to the Privacy Notice
. We may change this Privacy Notice from time and shall notify you of such changes.
Information We Collect
We collect information from you when you choose or permit a Child to use our Platform, Services and/or when you visit or use our Site.  In order to access certain services and content on our Platform, you will be required to register an account for yourself or on behalf of a Child and provide us with certain Personal Information. Registration of a Child is permitted only if you are such Child’s Parent or if you have obtained Parental Consent, in accordance with the Terms. We also collect Personal Information when you make use of the Platform and/or Site, request information from us, sign up for newsletters or our email lists, complete online forms, or contact us for any other reason. If you use the Platform or Site by logging in through any third-party login service, we may also receive Personal Information about you as provided or available by such third-party login service. Please check such third-party’s policies in order to understand what information we receive.
Examples of the Personal Information that we collect from you may include your or a Child’s name, birth year, your email address and other information regarding your and/or the Child’s use of and activity on the Platform, preferred language and age group, device location, language settings, and device type,  as well as certain user characteristics and preferences (such as whether a user is a teacher, Parent, Child, student or member of a particular class and/or School and/or Group). Such Personal Information may be collected by us through the Platform and/or Site.
Combining certain information, including information regarding your progress and/or participation in a Game and/or other Content available on the Platform may result in our collection of ‘special categories of data’ (as such term is defined in the Terms).
We also collect any materials including images, pictures, text, documents, audio recordings, comments, reviews, follows and likes, assignments, ratings,  photo’s or other User Content, you may provide, including when uploading a Game to the Platform and/or Site.
In addition, when you use the Platform and/or Site, certain information may be automatically gathered about your computer or mobile devices, such as operating system, device ID, device language, as well as your browsing history and any information regarding your viewing and user history on our Platform or Site.
It is your voluntary decision whether to provide us with any such Personal Information, but if you refuse to provide such information we may not be able to register you or your Child to the Platform and/or Services.
How We Use Your Personal Information
General
We and any of our trusted third-party subcontractors and service providers may use the Personal Information we collect from and about you for any of the following purposes: (1) to provide you with the Platform and Services; (2) to respond to your inquiries or requests, contact and communicate with you; (3) to develop new products or services and conduct analyses to improve our current content, products, and Services; (4) to provide you with customized content, subject to your consent as may be required under applicable law, targeted offers  on the Platform and/or Site, on other third-party sites or apps you may visit, or via e-mail; (5) to contact you with informational newsletters and promotional materials relating to our Platform or Services; (6) to review the usage and operations of our Platform, Services and/or Site; (7) to use your data in an aggregated, non-specific format for analytical purposes (as detailed below); (8) to prevent fraud, protect the security of our Platform, Services and/or Site, and address any problems with the Platform, Services and/or Site;(9) to provide customer support; (10) collect information for machine learning algorithms that helps us present better recommendations to you and (11) gather and present your or your child’s games performance reports.
Statistical Information
By analyzing all information we receive, including all information concerning users, we may compile statistical information across a variety of platforms and users (“
Statistical Information
“). Statistical Information helps understand trends and customer needs so that new products and services can be considered and so existing products and Services can be tailored to customer desires. Statistical Information is anonymous and aggregated and we will not link Statistical Information to any Personal Information. We may share such Statistical Information with our partners, without restriction, on commercial terms that we can determine in our sole discretion.
Analytics
We, or our service providers or subcontractors, may use analytics tools (“
Tools
“), including “Google Analytics” to collect information about the use of the Platform and/or Site. Such Tools collect information such as how often users visit the Platform and/or Site, what pages they visit when they do so, and what other sites and mobile applications they used prior to visiting the Platform and/or Site. We use the information we get from the Tools to improve our Platform, Site, and Services.  Google’s ability to use and share information collected by Google Analytics about your visits to this site is restricted by the Google Analytics Terms of Use and the Google Privacy Policy as stated on their website.
Behavioral Remarketing
TinyTap ltd uses remarketing services to advertise on third party websites to you after you visited our Service. We and our third-party vendors use cookies to inform, optimize and serve ads based on your past visits to our Services.
Google AdWords
Google AdWords remarketing service is provided by Google Inc.
You can opt-out of Google Analytics for Display Advertising and customize the Google Display Network ads by visiting the Google Ads Settings page.
Google also recommends installing the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on for your web browser.  Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on provides visitors with the ability to prevent their data from being collected and used by Google Analytics.
For more information on the privacy practices of Google, please visit the Google Privacy & Terms web page.
Facebook
Facebook remarketing service is provided by Facebook Inc.
You can learn more about interest-based advertising from Facebook on its website.
To opt-out from Facebook’s interest-based ads follow the instructions from Facebook on their website.
Facebook adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising established by the Digital Advertising Alliance. You can also opt-out from Facebook and other participating companies through the Digital Advertising Alliance in the USA, the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada in Canada, or the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance in Europe, or opt-out using your mobile device settings.
For more information on the privacy practices of Facebook, please visit Facebook’s Data Policy.
Pinterest
Pinterest remarketing service is provided by Pinterest Inc.
You can opt-out from Pinterest’s interest-based ads by enabling the “Do Not Track” functionality of your web browser or by following Pinterest’s instructions on their website.
You can learn more about the privacy practices and policies of Pinterest by visiting their Privacy Policy page.
Legal Uses
We may use your Personal Information as required or permitted by any applicable law.
Disclosure of Information
We may share your information, including Personal Information, as follows:
Business Partners, Service Providers, Affiliates, and Subcontractors
We may disclose information, including Personal Information we collect from and/or about you, to our trusted service providers, business partners, affiliates and subcontractors, who may use such information to: (1) help us provide you with the Platform, Services and/or Site; and (2) aid in their understanding of how users are using our Platform, Services and/or Site.
Disclosure to Group Leaders
If you are a Group Member, we may disclose information (including Personal Information) regarding your activity on the Platform and/or Site to the Group Leaders, as well as to any third party to whom you request we provide such information. If you are a Child, we will disclose or give access to your Personal Information to your Parent, and if we have received Parental Consent, to a Group Leader.
International Transfer
We may use subcontractors and service providers and have business partners and affiliates who are located in countries other than your own and send them the information we receive (including Personal Information). We will ensure that these third parties will be subject to written agreements ensuring the same level of privacy and data protection as set forth in this Privacy Notice. You hereby consent to such international transfer.
Business Transfers
We may transfer our databases containing your Personal Information if we sell our business or part of it, including in cases of liquidation. Information about our users, including Personal Information, may be disclosed as part of, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets or acquisition and shall continue being subject to the provisions of this Privacy Notice.
Law Enforcement Related Disclosure
We will fully cooperate with any law enforcement authorities or court order requesting or directing us to disclose the identity, behavior or (digital) content and information of or related to an individual, including in the event of any user suspected to have engaged in illegal or infringing behavior. We may also share your Personal Information with third parties: (i) if we believe in good faith that disclosure is appropriate to protect our rights, property or safety (including the enforcement of the Terms and this Privacy Notice); (ii) to protect the rights, property or safety of third parties; (iii) when required by law, regulation subpoena, court order or other law enforcement related issues; or (iv) as is necessary to comply with any legal and/or regulatory obligation. You can request such Personal Information as specified herein by emailing us at help @tinytap.it.
Other Uses or Transfer of Your Information
We allow you to use our Platform and/or Site in connection with third-party services, sites, and/or mobile applications. If you use our Platform and/or Site with or through such third-parties, we may receive information (including Personal Information) about you from those third parties. Please note that when you use third-parties outside of our Platform and Site, their own terms and privacy policies will govern your use of those services.
How We Protect Information
We make efforts to follow generally accepted industry standards to protect the Personal Information submitted to us, both during transmission and once we receive it. However, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure. Therefore, while we strive to use commercially acceptable means to protect your Personal Information, we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
How to Access and Limit Our Use of Certain Information
You have certain rights in relation to the Personal Information that we hold about you, as detailed below. We reserve the right to ask for reasonable evidence to verify your identity before we provide any information and/or comply with any of your requests, as detailed below:
The right of Access and Data Portability.
You have a right to know what Personal Information we collect about you and, in some cases, to have the information communicated to you. Subject to the limitations in applicable law, you may be entitled to obtain from us a copy of the Personal Information you provided to us (excluding information that we obtained from other sources) in a structured, commonly-used, and machine-readable format, and you  may have the right to (request that we) transmit such Personal Information to another party. If you or wish to exercise this right please contact us letting us know what information, in particular, you would like to receive and/or transmit. Subject to applicable law, we may charge you with a fee. Please note that we may not be able to provide you with all the information you request, for instance, if the information includes Personal Information about another person. Where we are not able to provide you with information that you have asked for, we will endeavor to explain to you why. We will try to respond to any request for a right of access as soon as possible.
Right to Correct Personal Information.
Subject to the limitations in applicable law, you may request that we update, correct or delete inaccurate or outdated Personal Information and/or that we suspend the use of Personal Information, the accuracy of which you may contest, while we verify the status of that Personal Information. We will correct your Personal Information within a reasonable time from the receipt of your written request thereof.
Deletion of Personal Information.
In certain circumstances, you have a right to have Personal Information that we hold about you deleted. Should you wish to have any Personal Information about you deleted, please contact us, using the contact information specified in this Privacy Notice. Subject to applicable law, we will delete Personal Information provided to us within a reasonable time from the receipt of a written (including via email) request by such user to delete such collected Personal Information. We cannot restore information once it has been deleted. Please note that to ensure that we do not collect any further Personal Information, you should also delete our mobile application from your mobile devices and terminate your account with us and clear our cookies from any device where you have used our Platform and/or Site. We may retain certain Personal Information (including following your request to delete) for audit and record-keeping purposes, as well as other purposes, all as permissible and/or required under applicable law. We may also retain your information in an anonymized form.
Account Deactivation.
You may deactivate your account through our website and/or mobile application or by contacting us using the information below. In order to deactivate your account, we may ask you for additional information.
Direct Marketing Opt Out.
You can change your mind at any time about your election to receive marketing communications from us and/or having your Personal Information processed for direct marketing purposes. If you do, please update your account settings on our website, or notify us by contacting us as detailed in this Privacy Notice. We will process your request as soon as reasonably possible, however, it may take a few days for us to update our records before any opt-out is effective.
Right to Object.
Subject to applicable law, you may have the right to object to the processing of your Personal Information including for the purpose of direct marketing.
Supervisory Authority
. If you are a European Citizen, you may have the right to submit a complaint to the relevant supervisory data protection authority.
Data Retention
We retain information as necessary for the purposes set forth above. We may delete information from our systems, without notice to you, once we deem it is no longer necessary for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Notice.
Cookies and Similar Technologies
What are Cookies?
A cookie is a small piece of text that is sent to a user’s browser or device. The browser provides this piece of text to the device of the originating user when this visitor returns.
A “session cookie” is temporary and will remain on your device until you leave the Platform or Site.
A “persistent” cookie may be used to help save your settings and customizations across visits. It will remain on your device for much longer or until you delete it.
First-party cookies are placed by us, while third-party cookies may be placed by a third party. We use both first- and third-party cookies.
Information may also be collected through web beacons, which are small graphic images (“pixel tags”), which usually work together with cookies in order to identify users and user behavior. These may be shared with third parties.
We may use the terms “cookies” to refer to all technologies that we may use to store data in your browser or device or that collect information or help us identify you in the manner described above.
How We Use Cookies
TinyTap uses cookies and similar technologies for a number of reasons, for example, in order to help personalize your experience and to help personalize the ads we serve you.
The specific names and types of the cookies, web beacons, and other similar technologies we use may change from time to time. However, the cookies we use generally fall into one of the following categories:
Type of Cookie
Why We Use These Cookies
Necessary
These cookies are necessary in order to allow the Site, Platform and Services work correctly. They enable you to access the site, move around, and access different services, applications, and tools. Examples include remembering previous actions (e.g. entered text) when navigating back to a page in the same session. These cookies cannot be disabled.
Functionality
These cookies remember your settings and preferences and the choices you make (such as language or regional preferences) and help us personalize your experience and offer you enhanced functionality and content.
Security
These cookies can help us identify and prevent security risks. They may be used to store your session information to prevent others from changing your password without your login information.
Performance
These cookies can help us collect information to help us understand how you use our Site and/or Platform, such as whether you have viewed messages or specific pages and how long you spent on each page. This helps us improve the performance of our Services.
Analytics
These cookies help us learn more about which features are popular with our users and how our Services can be improved.
Advertising
These cookies are placed in order to deliver content, including ads relevant and meaningful to you and your interests. They may also be used to deliver targeted advertising or to limit the number of times you see an advertisement. This can help us track how efficient advertising campaigns are, both for our own Services and for other websites.
How to Adjust Your Preferences
Most Web browsers are initially configured to accept cookies, but you can change this setting so your browser either refuses all cookies or informs you when a cookie is being sent. In addition, you are free to delete any existing cookies at any time. Please note that some features of the Services may function improperly when cookies are disabled or removed.
Adjusting your preferences as described in this section herein does not mean you will no longer receive advertisements, it only means the advertisement you do see will be less relevant to your interests.
Third Party Cookies
We use the following third-party cookies:
Facebook analytics and ads retargeting (Advertising and Analytics)
Hot-Jar analytics (analytics)
TinyTap Session ID and age and language preferences (Security, Functionality, Necessary)
Google Analytics (Analytics)
Google Tag Manager (Analytics)
Google Ad Remarketing (Advertising)
Stripe Authentication and tracking (Security)
Pinterest (Advertising and Analytics)
Tweeter (Advertising and Analytics)
Bing (Advertising and Analytics)
Third-Party Services: YouTube API
Our application integrates with the YouTube API Services to show video content selected by the content creators. By using our application, you acknowledge and agree to be bound by the YouTube Terms of Service (
https://www.youtube.com/t/terms
) and the Google Privacy Policy (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
). For further information on how YouTube handles data, please review these policies.
Third-Party Services: Google Fonts
Andika Font:
Copyright (c) 2020, SIL International (https://software.sil.org/andika), with Reserved Font Name Andika.
This Font Software is licensed under the SIL Open Font License, Version 1.1. This license is copied below, and is also available with a FAQ at: https://openfontlicense.org
Poppins Font:
Copyright (c) 2022, Indian Type Foundry (https://fonts.google.com/specimen/Poppins), with Reserved Font Name Poppins. This Font Software is licensed under the SIL Open Font License, Version 1.1. This license is copied below, and is also available with a FAQ at: https://openfontlicense.org
Third-Party Applications and Services
All use of third-party applications or services is at your own risk and subject to such third party’s privacy policies.
Communications
Subject to your consent and applicable law, we may send you e-mail or other messages and/or a newsletter about us or our Platform and/or Services. You may remove your Personal Information from our mailing list and stop receiving future communication from us by following the UNSUBSCRIBE link located at the bottom of each communication or by emailing us at help @tinytap.it.  You will also be given the opportunity to unsubscribe from commercial messages and service-related communications in any such e-mail or message we send, as well as through your account settings on the Platform.
Children
We collect personally-identifiable information from children under the age of sixteen (16) only subject to Parental Consent. In the event that you become aware that an individual under the age of sixteen (16) has enrolled without Parental Consent, please advise us immediately.
Changes
When creating a sub account, you shall be asked to accept the terms of this Privacy Notice on your behalf or on behalf of your / a Child (for the avoidance of doubt, if you are not a Parent and you accept the Privacy Notice on behalf of a Child, you represent and warrant that you have obtained consent from the Child’s Parent to accept this Privacy Notice on the Parent’s behalf. If you do not agree with the terms hereof, please do not use or permit your Child to use the Platform and/or Site.  We may update this Privacy Notice from time to time – in which case, we shall notify you of such changes. We will post the updated Privacy Notice on this page. Please come back to this page every now and then to make sure you are familiar with the latest version. Any new Privacy Notice will be effective from the date it is accepted by you.
Comments and Questions
If you have any comments or questions about our privacy policy, or if you wish for us to amend or delete your Personal Information, please contact us at help @tinytap.it.
Notice to California Residents: Your California Privacy Rights
If you are a California resident, you have the right to receive: a) information identifying all third-party companies to which we may have disclosed, within the past year, personal information pertaining to you for those companies’ direct marketing purposes; and b) a description of the categories of personal information disclosed. To obtain such information, please email your request to help @tinytap.it.
We do not respond to Do Not Track signals at this time.
Last updated: May 2024
Links
Download TinyTap on the App Store
Download TinyTap on Google Play
Official Site
Media & Press
TinyTap Press Kit
TinyTap Careers
Recent Posts
Why Should Students Play Their Way Into Learning?
Contact Us
TinyTap is looking for an iOS Partner
Pages
5 Tips for Promoting Your TinyTap Games
FAQ
Meet the TinyTap Team
Privacy Policy Children
Privacy Policy for FindIt
Terms of Use and Privacy Policy
Data Sharing Agreement
TinyTap Press Kit
TinyTap Trusted Teachers!
What are TinyTap’s subscription terms?
Why Should Students Play Their Way Into Learning?
איך זה עובד?
ברוכים הבאים לטייני טאפ
זמן איכות משפחתי עם טייני טאפ
מרכז התובנות
Categories
App Store
Children's Authors
Create an App
Creation Inspiration
Games
Guide
hidden
Holidays
How To
Jobs
New features
News
Parenting
Press Release
Sell Your Game
Teach Kids Anything
Teacher of the Month
Teaching
Uncategorized
Verizon
Video
עברית